1 out of 5 - Language – “Shut up” is said once, along with several uses of “oh my God”. “Stupid” and other names ring throughout the book.
I weep upon the windshield of the world;
I just returned from a very, very successful wedding reception at the lovely Elkridge Furnace Inn this Saturday night (I'm writing this 1:00 AM Sunday.) It was successful in many respects -- everything went smoothly, the food was wonderful, the toasts were memorable, the crowd had a great time, and of course there was LOTS of dancing ... the dance floor was packed all night. It was an elegant reception, but very high-energy and fun.
Vox STPL 58.170
The down side was that I was (and am) easily distracted and impulsive. Sometimes in an effort to better meet students’ needs I would go off on a wild goose chase or get in deeply over my head. My willingness to improve and fly by the seat of my pants drove some students crazy.
Inside the porch are inscriptions above the door and into the main bar there is lots of dark wood and unfortunately dark paint. To the back left is a more comfortable room with sofas and a dining area beyond. The bar screams brewery chain, all new wood and chrome and spotlights, and this is indeed a Lees House - I understand that a few years back it was a free house selling local beers. On this occasion the beer choice was the Governor, which I misread as 3.5, but in bottles is 4.1 and rate beer reckons is 3.8, their standard Bitter, and the Great Budworth Bitter.
The word "pony" reminds me of The Sugarcubes song "Cowboy" (on the Elektra Album (USA version of) "Life's too good").
Doc: "Marty! They've approved us for a sequel! Get in and let's go!"
Cumcumber-Yogurt Sauce (with additions its Tzatziki!)
There was a brief moment of excitement as an N253 hove into view on our side, yet it turned out to be out of service – though this did at least instigate a bit of drama as one cold passenger took on the driver when her refused to let us on board.
As I talked about in my last post, my celebrating of this holiday (and most likely the years to come because of my choice of profession) was celebrated by make a bunch of heart-shaped treats, as well as the others I talked about before.
Please know and trust, the stars really turned out for Jazz on the Grass. In addition to Chiklis, I saw Dondre Whitfield and his lovely wife, Sallie Richardson-Whitfield, Attila Shabazz (daughter of Malcolm X), James Avery and Tatiana Ali of The Fresh Prince of Bel Air, Reginald VelJohnson of Family Matters, CCH Pounder, comedian Chris Spencer, Drop Dead Diva star Brooke Elliott, Access Hollywood's Shaun Robinson, Vanessa Bell Calloway, and three Grey's Anatomy stars -- James Pickens Jr., Justin Chambers, Showtime at the Apollo's Kiki Shepherd, and Kevin McKidd.
After lunch, we walked all around the square. It was very crowded because the Amgen Tour of California was getting ready to begin Sunday and they were having events for the bicyclists all over the county.
Oh ED!!!!!!!
Hair: Blonde
Comber had come over to Malaya as part of the re-occupying forces that took over as the Japanese surrendered. In 1946 he was appointed to the police force in Malaya. He served as OCPD (Officer in Charge of Police District) KL South; at that time KL was divided into north and south zones for policing.
Just the way Life Should be.
While vacationing on the ocean liner SS Kaiser Wilhelm der Grosse, a disgruntled city employee James J. Gallagher, fired from his job on the docks, took out his frustration on Gaynor, shooting him through the back of the neck. Gallagher claimed, “He took away my bread and meat. I had to do it.” Really, James?
“Woe unto them! for they have gone in the way of Cain, and ran greedily after the error of Balaam for reward, and perished in the gainsaying of Core.” Jude 11
47. Tan Sleeve-Too Big To Fail (Transparency)
I am heading to Arizona tomorrow, so I wanted to pick a fun color that will look good poolside. I chose a great Tangerine shade that looks appropriate now and will be great going into summer.
Supplies: Memory Book & Card
Angel went to a bloody war at the original ECW against the one and only New Jack over who was the King of the Streets.
In this situation, a promising new technology appears on the horizon, but the manufacturer neither understands which customers to target nor the task it could do for them. In such a case, the company creates a prototype, virtual or physical, and through observation based research (like empathic design techniques) discovers the task it could fulfill for the most lucrative set of customers.
The introduction of these bacteria and their flourishing is what we call ‘cycling the tank’. There are many, many articles on this process, so I won’t go into depth. The point is that all the bacteria mentioned above are almost everywhere in the environment. So it’s no problem getting the bacteria into the tank. But these bacteria must have food (the nitrogen compounds) to live on while they are populating your tank. Hence the recomendation that you add ammonia or drop a piece of shrimp into the tank. The shrimp will decompose (encouraged by other bacteria) thereby producing ammonia.
A few hours later, the electricity was once again restored and I'm now back to preparing for the fun weekend ahead. That includes baking a batch of White Chocolate Craisin Oaties! I'll use my recipe for Craisin Raisin Oaties (printable recipe) with a couple changes. The added Nutmeg - oh yes, yummy!
All demagogues require show trials to support their social engineering, and our demagogues are no different.
The next hour and a half you listen – after all, you can't watch – as a group of orbiting athletes and scientists slowly comes to grips with their situation. They are drifting out past the rings of Saturn inside a strange constellation of unlit rooms – and they will never have light in the station again.
However, it seems that this tomb is also known, especially to typographers, as the Caslon tomb. This is because it was originally the grave of William Caslon (1692-1766), famous as a gunsmith and designer of typefaces who had a typefoundry nearby.
St: How's your visit with the kids going?
It's not just America: here in Britain, though to a lesser extent you'll find euphemisms in denial of excretory functions. Especially where it concerns facilities for the ladies, they'll retire to the "powder-room" (powder-rooms, historically, supplied bags of gunpowder for loading cannons).... no, well powder-room's a bit archaic, most likely to be found in old hotels which are firmly stuck in the nineteen-fifties. Women still do say "I'm just going to powder my nose." men might say " "I'm just going to see a man about a dog"....
note: I am not sponsored by or affiliated with Ruche--just a window shopper in love with their pieces.
Anyway, I think I'm going to start posting comics on Fridays or the weekends. Partly because it's an easy way to give you something to read while still giving myself time on the weekend to relax and also because many of you will probably be drunk and I promise that these are a lot funnier when you're drunk.
The patterns we find may not in fact explain anything. I’m old enough to remember where I was when President Kennedy was shot (in a shopping mall). In the aftermath of the absurdity of that crime, people turned up many types of previously unnoticed patterns, including a seemingly endless list of ways in which Kennedy’s life parralleled that of Abraham Lincoln. My personal favorite item in that list was the importance given to the fact that their assassins, John Wilkes Booth and Lee Harvey Oswald, each used three names that had a total of 15 letters. It reminds me of the joke: What do John the Baptist and Winnie the Pooh have in Common? (Answer: Their middle name.)
The Justice for Visteon Pensioners facebook page has linked up with other Visteon employees in Cadiz, Spain who are in the process of having their employment terminated with their work being sent to Shanghai, China. Over 450 workers are affected.
It’s been a while, but with the semester finally over, I now have plenty of time to keep my blog updated. I’ll admit my pictures won’t be as good (I really need a new camera) but I will try to post them when I can!
This is not accomplished yet.
Save for a few whackos and nut cases, we believe in the evolution or revolution through the ballot boxes. None of us believe that we could change things by taking to the streets, a la people power.
I decided this year it was time for me to make my first ever bracket! You would think with Butler making it all the way to the final games (2 years in a row) that I would have done this sooner!
When I return to the office I will hopefully have a few job prospects in the pipeline. It won’t take long for me to secure one and I’ll then have only a month’s notice period to work out.
(that’s what she said.)
1 x Y66116-RED / F / air = 26.00
Limited edition bonus track:
On my part, I’ve seen photos of Keith with other guests. One pose was even similar to one picture we had together. I laughed when I saw it. My reactions was probably like that because I don’t have feelings for Keith. I like Keith inside Earthling as my regular, yes. I find him attractive, yes. But I don’t want him exclusively. And I have no complaints if he does whatever with his other guests. My only concern is that he makes me enjoy my time with him when I pick him in Earthling. I admit it probably would be different if I liked Keith the way Jess likes Ramon. The green eyed monster may have gotten me too then.
A police officer who does not know what the word “consent” means is just about the most frightening thing I can imagine when dealing with these officers of the corporate code. A whole United States military and police department without such knowledge, and the true nature of our society comes rushing in.
One of the biggest and most amazing lessons I learned this weekend was that if God gives me a nudge, I'd better listen. Because the nudges will get more and more persistent.
got.
4. Reality Shows
It has to be essentially the most amazing criminal timepieces ever produced, as it will take care of shooting what you really are Spying on and creating it. You can also have a few still shots with it. All you have to do is demand the watch for 3 working hours and you’re simply completely ready in your latest work.
Hi All. Here quickly with a CAS birthday guy card. One of my favorite guy friends is celebrating soon and Noah (Creepin Kit, The Greeting Farm) was perfect for him. He recently grew out his hair and it looks all crazy and curly like a combo of Noah and Side Show Bob, lol!
The good you do today, people will often forget tomorrow;
a very, useful little place
HARRISBURG, Pa. — The billboard is down, but the issue’s not gone.
I have already commented myself in these proceedings and mentioned having an open equipment market for cellular phones and tablets that can work with the carrier of the individual’s choice and would encourage others to do so as well. Please note that the FCC’s next Open Commission meeting is on Friday April 27th at which time they will vote on some proposed rules in proceedings related to standardized and enhanced disclosure pertaining to broadcaster’s public interest obligations (00-168) that while still open the commenting period for rules has passed, and on a few other proceedings related to USF contributions etc.
As he hurried to catch up to Pippi, he heard the noise once more.
He, Rubio and a few others are working on a revised ‘Dream Act’ that will be introduced AFTER the Republican Convention.
As each guest arrived, they were asked to pick a Tinkerbell foam puzzle piece out of a bag. I found the foam puzzles at Dollar Tree and was able to color-coordinate the pieces to match the fairy tutus & wings. This made it easy to split the girls into 3 different groups for crafts.
Recent claims include an account from El Salvador described by CNN affiliate Seattle TV station KIRO as very similar to the Colombia scandal, involving members of the Secret Service and other government agencies.
The sun shone and the atmosphere was buzzing thanks to the events on the stage and the childrens tent with magician and storyteller. It was great to listen to a male voice choir, steel band and local indie band whilst chatting to everyone.
here's some interesting info about this company..
Sometimes I think humans enjoy trying to outdo each other intellectually in public to prove how far we’ve evolved from that dim witted creature who crawled out of primordial ooze. If we cut each other down in private where no one can see how awesome we are, what’s the point really?
I need to raise the bed .. a few feet.
“I was asked to participate in a second phone interview while I was on vacation, and because I was very interested in the job, I obliged. Before I started to answer the first question, my phone completely died. I had no way of retrieving the phone number. Needless to say, I did not get the job.”
Watt could be speaking of all relationships with her quote “William and I have living together for more than two decades in the same house. In that time we have growing happiness in the same measure as collecting grief”.
“If you are my spirit guide come back and chase off these two attackers once and for all”. Perhaps he heard me and he had some sympathy for this city guy lying on his stomach hugging the solid rock beneath me. But with no further adieu he continued through his tacking and, arriving on a new, course headed right for me. Climbing in altitude he took a position that was advantageous for his mission. Having the weather gauge he, as before, dived straight at one of the two attackers. The white bird dived steeply like a bullet and at the last minute he pivoted his body and swung around to present his open talons to his target, which, I noticed, was mid dive attacking me. This attacker must have had an instinctive feeling of his own for at the very last second he broke off his attack on me and violently flipped over and to the right just avoiding the many sharp talon points of the masked white bird.
The rest of the cast were generally very good, particularly Ekaterina Gubanova's captivating performance as Lyubasha, the furiously obsessed love rival, whose refulgently warm mezzo, stage presence and superior acting made her the centre of the action. She's also an ex-ROH Young Artist and seems to me to be a far better ambassador for the House. Mark Elder in the pit gave the strongest possible advocacy for what is an exciting and passionate score, even if one knows and feels throughout that it is not a first rate opera.
706 ***D-XII/6/1975. “The Character of a Matricide: On Aeschylus’ Oresteia,” Basic Program Staff Seminar, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1991(4), above, pp. 804-07, 1041, and in Item B-15 (Projected), above, pp. 48-52, 67-68 (2004).) Harry Kalven Freedom of Expression Award, Illinois Division, American Civil Liberties Union, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1977(2), above, pp. 370-72.) The first recipient of the Award was Malcolm P. Sharp. Compare Item D-XI/14/1991, below. See Item D-III/6(A)/1975, above.
The news first came weeks before the filming of RENO 911! Season Six. The show creators Thomas Lennon, Robert Ben Garant and Kerri Kenney-Silver has delivered the ending to Season Five cliffhanger. Deputy James Garcia, Deputy Clementine Johnson and Deputy Cherisha Kimball were killed at the Taco Stand accident. Shocker!
My good pal and resident idea-guy/consultant/creative genius Andrew Kilzer shot and edited the "bumper" thing at the beginning. We're still working out the kinks on it, but I thought it looked cool enought to try it out. It's not like I'm known for super-professional-looking videos.
This piece ends my 'pull' into Sacred Vessels...6 pieces at this time and I'm sure I'll return to creating more vessels as they are an inexhaustible resource for me. Beginning now in September I'll be framing and preparing for a small local showing. My other challenge for Sept will be a deep cleaning and reorganizing of the studio.I don't know how I will sort through my collage boxes...maybe just buy bigger boxes?
7 Casa Llena Okashi 4:43
The Phantom of Pemberley is my favorite because it was my first attempt at writing a cozy mystery. I have read cozies for years, and I loved the idea of trying to incorporate all the characteristics of the genre into my Pride and Prejudice mystery. Normally, a cozy is set in a village, where all those involved are familiar with each other. There is no graphic violence, no explicit sex scenes, and no profanity. Cozies are considered “genteel” mysteries. Think of “Murder She Wrote” on TV or Agatha Christie, and one has the cozy format. A cozy would never make a good “action” movie: the emphasis is on plot twists and character development. In The Phantom of Pemberley, I used the idea of “The Shadow Man,” which is what Wes Craven reportedly used for his Freddy Krueger. In England, the “shadow man” is a popular legend. Plus, Adam Lawrence becomes an active member of the story line. Lawrence has had “walk throughs” in several of my novels. In “Phantom,” he became an integral part of the cast, and I am so pleased with the outcome. (I have written a novella that tells Lawrence’s story. I hope to publish it soon.) I was rewarded for my attempts by having “Phantom” marked with a third place finish in Romantic Suspense in a RWA (Romance Writers of America) contest in 2010.
Saying “Who will make it right?”
I wasn't at the shows, and I haven't listened to that stuff a lot, I feel like I kind of can't judge. They were doing a slightly different thing then, and you know, fine.
It was really one of those surreal moments - as all moments are when you first get to the ocean. You forget how massive it is. Each time I get near a beach, I get that oh so small feeling that feels oh so good.
This coming weekend, my wife and I are heading to NYC to attend a brewfest called Beer for Beasts. Last year was the first year they held it and after reading about it I knew we had to go. Basically, Sixpoint brews 40+ different one off beers on their little pilot system and makes them available for this fest. All proceeds from it benefit The Humane Society of NYC, hence the name. We'll be attending the evening session if anyone reads this and is going as well.
Mad River
Cover bowls with foil and place into preheated oven, baking for 20 minutes. Ten minutes before the bowls are to come oven, heat fry pan up over medium. Combine eggs and half & half, pour into warm pan and cook, stirring around with spatula until mixture begins to be almost set. You want the eggs to still be slightly runny. Place into bowl with sausage, mushrooms and onions, stirring to combine.
de mi vida actual... *("de mi olvido actual" in Biagi's version)
The 2010 horror movie, Insidious, is one of the most frightening things I’ve ever seen. This movie made me shiver! A family moves into a new house and one of the sons, Dalton, says he doesn’t like his new room. One day he hears something up in the attic, so he’s goes up there to see if he could find anything. As he was on the a ladder, one of the steps broke, throwing Dalton on the floor. The next day, Dalton wouldn’t wake up, so he was rushed to the hospital where the doctor said he was in a very unusual coma.
It'll be to a millionaire
The number of “How could I’s” that my conscience raised were answered with equal if not more number of justifications by my mind. However, my conscience will not be quiet.
When you care enough, you send the very best and call just to see how you’re doing.
Nevertheless, every person, Jew or Gentile, must accept Jesus Christ as Lord and Savior, or else they are making themselves enemies of God. God loves everyone. If you are a Jew today reading this, I challange you to learn about Jesus, search the Old Testament, and see if He really is your Messiah.
Throughout the book Watt’s photographs and illustrations add another dimension to the narrative. Water themed pictures or happy family snaps all seem to complement the stories being told.
So there you have it. This was probably one of the best and most memorable Thanksgivings I have had thanks to Dan's wonderful family:)
But read on:Both Labour and the Conservatives yesterday urged SNP ministers to set up a dedicated pot of cash to tempt airlines to fly routes direct to the new global economic powerhouses.So the Tories are at it just like Labour. No wonder lots of us have given up voting for them.
Household
There is good news for everyone but only if you obey the demands of God. Today we are looking at Acts 27:22 as the apostle Paul shouts above the storm seeking to cheer the despondency of those aboard the stricken vessel.
"Mommy............. Tell me about baby Timmy"................
3:30AM: After knocking on my friend’s door and ringing her doorbell repeatedly, I sat on the stairs.
I've used lovely 'rose petal' seam binding from Wild Orchid Crafts to tie the bow & added little die cut corners for added dimension. The little frame charm is resting on top of a piece of antique lace holding a little Crafty Secrets birdie image inside. Can you see the little birdie? LOL It's super tiny. I think there's nothing sweeter than adding little birdies to a project. I've also added a tiny little floss bow.
Embellishments (Colors/Sizes May Vary Per Kit)
Just a reminder that JustRite Original Stamp Retirement Sale will end at midnight on March 21st. After March 21st all these great stamp sets will return to full price. These are the lowest JustRite Original Prices of the Year!
a certificate with blank spaces
I had to get my crown done this morning. I have a temporary on right now, for a week, and then my permanent comes in. I can't chew on my right side because teeth are little back there and they are afraid it is going to just pop right off. Hope it doesn't tomorrow when I am with the cake people. Can you say embarrassing! Geeshh
Some people hunt animals.....for fun! Fuckin' idiots!
How can anyone claim to be a Christian while ignoring the very lyrical lessons we were taught as children to love all those who are different from ourselves in color or ethnicity or religion or whatever just as Jesus did? How can we claim to be Christians – the children of Jesus – if we do not follow the lead of Jesus in loving all the people of the world?
My heart is to re-publish this article. Listening is so important. We fail to practice it with our own close people as there are much to trigger us but still, it is a great tool to improve relationships.
Other than that, things have been going great here. Time is flying by, which it always does when we're back. But, we're really trying our best to make the most out of it. Seeing friends, traveling, doing lots in Houston and taking in every single second at home. Which, as you can imagine, is why I have been a little MIA.
Work is super crazy right now. I'm part of a very small planning committee for a very big company event that's being held in mid-October, and we didn't start planning it until about 2 weeks ago. So...yeah. Of course it's taking up WAY more of my time that I anticipated, and that's on top of my normal work stuff. I'm just trying to keep my head above water at this point. Let me just say that, by the time our short little honeymoon gets here, I will be more than ready for some downtime.
We all came out to Montreux
“I don’t think that women ought to sit down at table with men. It ruins conversation and I’m sure it’s very bad for them. It puts ideas in their heads, and women are never at ease with themselves when they have ideas.”
February 12 - Kenneth Mars, actor ("Young Frankenstein"), 75
Kasher: We take decisions that reflect our acceptance of some aspects of international law; other parts, we have not accepted. The prime question, in these fields of morals and ethics, is what I see when I look in the mirror – not when I watch the BBC.
1. Thank the editor and let her know that you’re planning to find an agent to negotiate on your behalf. Let her know that you’ll get back to her in 7 to 10 days (and then of course get back to her in that time frame). Do NOT tell the editor you accept her offer or anything even remotely similar. This will ruin any possibility of the agent negotiating on your behalf.
~Instead of trying to be flawless on your first attempt, learn from your mistakes and make a thorough list of what you can improve next time. Put far greater value in learning and improving a little every day, than in being “perfect.” (This has been a particularly powerful tool for me personally.)
Vinegar is your indispensable kitchen helper. In addition to eliminating the smell of burning you can use it to clean the refrigerator. Irrigate a towel (cloth) with water and vinegar. Squeeze it and then wipe all surfaces inside the fridge. No need to rub. Stains and odors disappear instantly. It smells of detergent. Similarly, you can proceed with a bread box. When glass and porcelain vessels lose their luster, again you will need vinegar. Mix water, vinegar and coffee or water, sea salt and vinegar and wash them.
Formed in 2006, Steel Mill Pictures is based in London and has produced several feature films over the years including the award-winning, critically-acclaimed 'London to Brighton'. Most recently the team came to Glasgow to shoot the Irvine Welsh novel 'Filth' about a bipolar, bigoted, junkie cop who manipulates and hallucinates his way through the festive period. Ken Marshall, producer on the film talks about his experience of filming the production here in Glasgow in 2012.
McCrum appears fairly meticulous in details, for example naming the actors who played Wodehouse’s characters on stage and in film. So it was conspicuous (to me) that he neglected to mention the names Fry and Laurie who played Jeeves and Bertie, in my estimation convincingly. I can hardly doubt they were in mind, however, when he mentioned in passing, in the Epilogue, “Film and television producers continue to toy with adaptations of his work, generally proving the rule that the best literature makes the worst cinema.” Although my attachment to the Fry and Laurie series is at least in part sentimental, and I am enough of a curmudgeon when it comes to literature-come-film to appreciate McCrum’s feelings.
when i was in oregon visiting nicole (my bff),
The main area of the KGB per Bezmenov is focused on a slow process of ideological subversion, psychological warfare, to change the perception of reality for Americans to not be able to make sensible conclusions for their interests. This is done via Demoralization:
June was the month when i was going through no-joys-all-sorrows phase of year 2010. And being the person i am, i admit i give into disappointments too easily although i do not let them rule my head for long. This post is a reminder of the fact that sorrows do not last, but when you get them as company, do not feel ashamed to be weak at times.
I am with you in prayer and sprit and may your prophetic stance and prayerful vigil draw attention to this great evil of our time. Then last week I reported that Bishop Alan Hopes, (pictured right) the Catholic auxiliary bishop of Westminster, is due to attend a 40 days for life vigil in central London. I urged (and I urge again) as many as possible to be present this coming Friday to support Bishop Hopes in his pro-life witness.
One commenter last week left a great line: She said, "Bless you new moms. If you're trying, you're doing a great job." We don't have to be perfect; we just have to be gentle to ourselves and take it one step at a time.
06 Breakdown
Oh how we Pra​ise God!!!!
I'm grateful to Matt for postponing deadlines to share his own baseball biography. If you want to share the love of the game with young people, start with his books. Like him on Facebook to be eligible for monthly prizes. He gives away an autographed book. For the Aaron book, he added an original sketch of the slugger with his autograph. See it, and learn more at www.matttavares.com
Photo Album
As the Malcolm Hardee Awards are, in part, a search for the bizarre, this is a fitting report and I know Malcolm would certainly have approved.
Aylesbury’s Mix96 website (for the radio station) describes the forthcoming UAF counter-demo as a ‘peaceful counter demonstration’. Oh, yes? Well, if that’s actually a UAF self-description it should hardly be relied upon. They are not going to say that they’ll be 'holding a violent counter- demo' are they? It’s amazing how all these regional newspapers and websites are sucked in by the UAF/SWP. But that’s what Trots have always been good at. Sucking people in under false pretences. The revolutionaries and the radicals rarely say why they are really marching or why they are obsessed with ‘defeating fascism’ – obsessed to such a degree that they have to concoct various 'fascist' enemies and accuse just about everyone under the sun of being ‘racist’, ‘fascist’ or, nowadays, ‘Islamophobic’. All this is part and parcel of a larger revolutionary or radicalisation package which is hidden from all those gullible Methodist and Anglican clergy who think the Trots are only trying to ‘embrace diversity’ and ‘fight for community cohesion’. No they aren’t! They are trying to destroy ‘straight’ society. And if that includes alignments with Muslims and the Anglican clergy – then so be it.
This is how I think we can do it:
Boyfriend: "I need to get back to work, Allie."
The only 'amber ale' I can drink and will and indeed do pay for is the Greenflash Hop Head Red, but that is kind of a special beer. Similar to the calico in that it's a kind of amber/red ale hybrid.
Else moonstruck with music and madness
Clear example of prioritizing things in discipleship:
One thing I noticed that sets Warrior Food apart from some of the competing brands is that their recommended serving size is only about 2.25 tablespoons, which is about half of other products. The protein per serving is 15.4g (as opposed to 25 or so). When I asked about this I was told that the company is finding that the athletes they are testing are doing so well assimilating this protein that they have been able to cut back on the amount they are taking as a supplement because they are absorbing more and recovering and preforming well on a smaller dose. Ultimately I think you have to do what you normally do with any of these types of products which is to listen to your body and do what is right for you. I do like the idea of taking as little as you need to see results- because an excess in protein isn't any better for your body than a deficit.
Update: Textgram now has the Tweegram ‘Hello Kitty’ template & it now supports Emoji.
Let´s kick start this thing with the basic element of any wargames army. The figures. In this pic you can see all the figures needed. They are all manufactured by Hat.
- attacked the American gunboat USS Panay which was sent to rescue people in the Yangtze River: aboard were journalists, diplomats, and crewmembers. It was escorting 2 oil tankers filled with refugees from Nanking, China. Japanese planes bombed the vessel and fired at survivors in the water who were trying to reach the banks of the river. (In the 1930s, the United States had a treaty with China allowing American gunboats to travel deep up the Yangtze River to protect its trade route from pirate attacks.)
And finally, a brew I haven't tried, is Bell's Christmas Ale, a Scotch Ale that boasts Michigan grown barley and hops, which was a gift from Justin. I'm sure it won't last long.
“There are mysterious circumstances surrounding his death,” said Elizabeth Espinosa, a news reporter for KTLA-TV. “We’re told detectives are looking into the possibility that he was poisoned by arsenic.”
But despite this, and some terribly aimed shots from Barcelona, they hung on and claimed the spoils.
Sadly, the American Red Cross is not the only group which has been trampled upon by the Solidarity Singers. In the spring, typically thousands of schoolchildren come from all across the state to visit their State Capitol. They travel on buses, sometimes from several hours away, to tour with fellow students and teachers and learn about our state government.
This is another British item I've been coveting for a long, long time. My blog friend, Troy at Junk Exchange blog makes these. Troy always amazes me with his ability to create beautiful and useful things. If you haven't visited his and Rod's blog, here's the link.
If your mother was married to another man at the time of your birth, you were legitimate, but legally the child of her husband. There are all kinds of subtle (and sometimes not so subtle) jokes and references in Regency and Georgian novels about ladies letting a “cookoo” in the nest—passing off the child of an affair as one belonging to her husband. It’s even a major plot point in Julia Quinn’s It’s In His Kiss: the hero and his “father” both know he’s the product of his mother’s affair, but he’s still the legal heir to his “father’s” title and fortune.
I'm so excited about my new WIP!
-Balancing breath, brain, and mind-mastering stress and enhancing performance in every arena of your life.
■The full sets will be revealed on Thursday night!
Group Two
I did get back on, though, and I kept going until the falling snow stung my face and made it difficult to see. People who ski regularly invest in equipment like goggles and face masks–I understand the value of these items now. But I don’t think I’ll ever fall into the category of people who ski regularly. Don’t get me wrong: Saturday’s excursion WAS fun, despite my lack of grace, and I’m grateful that I was invited to tag along on Zach’s school’s trip.
By knocking on the window, call
But, one thing has changed during the 2011.
13 Pinball Wizard (3:13)
So, it seems that the alarmists are going to focus on eliminating coal, which provides roughly 50% of the world’s power supply. Just to play my well worn cassette, none of them ever suggest that they themselves practice what they preach. They just want to make others pay for their unhinged and anti-science beliefs.
“Well, that magazine over there,” the waitress pointed with her head again, and again, Beth’s eyes followed, “That’s the magazine that published it. It’s good. You might want to read it…”
God created all life, including all the nasty virus’ and bacteria as well as allowing a design flaw such as Cancer through the net too (amongst a few others)…. Doh!
“That I may know him, and the power of his resurrection, and the fellowship of his sufferings, being made conformable unto his death; If by any means I might attain unto the resurrection of the dead.”
Last but not least Jean Paul Gaultier supplied this gorgeous gown for the cover of Kylie's most recent album Aphrodite.
of the deep deep waters
and a young man almost as tall as me for company
I did not know does not cut it…it’s like the law of handling stolen goods.
These verses of At-Taubah were revealed under certain circumstances. The following verses chronologically precede these verses of Surah At-Taubah. They provide an insight into the circumstances in which Surah At-Taubah was revealed.
That's when Coraline decides she would rather have her original life. "The needle's so sharp, it won't hurt" is Other-father's idea of reassurance.
I awakened to a quiet voice saying “Write it down”. I still had that feverish feeling and I wrote the dream in my journal.
6). The Texas Rangers signed Darvish for 6 years, at about $112 million dollars, (including a one-time honorarium) to negotiate with his Japan representation. According to the site “baseball-reference.com,” his salary is actually about $56 million. They do include a note that this information may not be completely updated.
Pam Anderson is a cookbook author and recipe developer whose name I seldom hear, and that's a shame. Her recipes are rooted by the main attraction, followed by a myriad of deviations. A typical recipe includes directions for, say, a basic pork braise. She includes variations for turning that pork into: Mexican, Italian, or French. The seasonings and liquids change, but the basic recipe is rooted in method. Brilliant.
And most of the original cast from the movies MIB and MIB II are back, Will Smith still plays as agent J, yang sekarang udah jadi salah satu agen veteran di MIB, Tommy Lee Jones also still plays as agent K, along with Josh Brolin, who also plays as agent K, the younger version of him. And yeah, for you Beliebers out there, Justin Bieber plays as a cameo in this movie also.
Some stunning photos from one of the largest European castles, located approximately 2 hours of travel from my place. I've been there more than ten times. I hope that you'll enjoy it :)
Ain’t about what’s waiting on the other side
Green top: Kohls. Belt: Macy’s. Skirt: Deb (I think). Pumps: Chinese Laundry. Bracelet and Necklace: Forever XXI.
If you think this is interesting, then do have a listen to the podcast. Dr. Menuge is not an ordinary academic – he is very direct. He calls materialism “a catastrophe” in the podcast! Not a shrinking violet.
So similar to that of Divergent and just as powerful. It had me going OMG what is going to happen in Insurgent. I need to read it and find out right now!
Arvon + Patrick Ness = a golden equation even for the practised amongst us
In the meanwhile, I have a proposal. Those of you who would come here daily anyway? Come here still and I will try make it worth your while.
I finally wanted to give a big Thank You to everyone that commented, liked and read my banana nutella post thanks to being Freshly Pressed 3 weeks ago ! It meant a lot to me and I’m very grateful for that !! Thank You one more time !
A group calling itself ‘Raise Your Voice’ hacked on Tuesday around 16 Lebanese government websites to ask for an improvement in living standards, the day the parliament launches a three-day session to assess the cabinet’s performance.
Kiwi (optional and cut into small bite-size pieces)
Just wanted to quickly pop on and say hello. I'm enjoying a lazy Saturday at home. John and I went to our favorite morning breakfast spot, as we haven't been there in about a year, and had a great breakfast. Now I'm at home doing laundry and I'll do a little grading. Then later we're meeting some friends for bowling and dinner.
7. Spending quality time with my parents on Sunday
4) The Original Star Wars Trilogy – WITHOUT ANY ADDED CRAP
He pushed his hat back a bit with the glass in his hand. She raised her eyes and said teasingly “Always with the hat?” Leaning back against the door frame he said “That’s an excellent question, darlin’, an excellent question. I’ve always worn a hat, since Little League, and now, I guess I think it adds to the mystery. Does he or doesn’t he have hair, now that is the real question.” “I know you have hair”, she said, “I’ve seen pictures without”. “Now see you’ve gone and spoiled my mystique. That’s all I’ve got going on”, he grinned. “Oh, you’ve got a lot more than a hat going on”, she said.
4.) The Pretty Things – S.F. Sorrow / 1969
If you want to see more detailed photos of either project just click on the photo for more images of each one.
out of the corner of my eye
To call her out for being
I few years back there was a song by Joan Osborne that said: What if God was one of us?
Brenda Musich donated a bunch of boxes for wrapping up the gifts.
Accommodation: 5 nights in a little beachside bungalow for $350
and the time to sit down and give details,
The following is a response to a question given to me by a high school student this week. I thought it was a good question and fitting with the current Sunday Series. The question, “If I pray for something in Jesus’ name shouldn’t I expect it to happen based on John 14:13?”
Cool card revoked.
Critique group vote (from a guy):
The Red arrows represent avenues of approach into our AO. In this case our AO had two issues: A paved county road running North to South and an unimproved dirt road that runs east to west. There are other avenues but generally all of them run into the main ones.
they’ve been there when no one was there, they’ve been there for
It's Sunday. It's the 22nd. And those on Facebook will know it's my birthday. Yep a time to think about the year gone and what I want to achieve in the year to come. Mostly, I just look forward to the cake. *LOL*
Can Mr. Paul become the next president of the United States? At the risk of inflaming his supporters, I must say I doubt it. The media’s message is that he no longer exists, the question is settled and Mr. Romney is the Republican nominee. It is true Mr. Paul’s most ardent supporters are strenuously working at the precinct level to tilt the delegate count at the Republican convention in his favor. Do they have the numbers to pull that off? I don’t know. But knowing the ones involved locally I would guess their chances are better than 50/50. Will that type of organized effort be successful in enough states nationwide to put Mr. Paul over the top? Your guess is as good as mine. I’m not even going there.
do the type of drug(s) that they were doing.”
Cost: no set price for students or unemployed – any donation welcome; others: £50 suggested.
60ml Cloudy Apple Juice
But this type of ‘influencer’ marketing smacks of elements of traditional communications which peer to peer Internet philosophy rather bites its thumb at…
Here my daughter stands in her perfect little world, as part of a perfect little unit consisting of Mommy, Daddy, and her. Now, here comes this new person set to infiltrate her perfect little unit and life. Now, to add insult to injury, my little girl can’t even just have a birthday to herself?
I had just peed on the stick and found out I was pregnant with my first bio child as I jetted off to Vegas with the fam. My parents, husband, two step kids, and I toured the entire strip. I’d never seen this feather-clad whore of a city, and I loved every tacky moment of our stay. From the hooker baseball cards taped to the street signs, to the lights of Fremont Street–this city has since come to represent my whole parenting experience.
Okay, catch you later, peeps. See you when I get back from LaLa Land.
My readers will be glad to know I put on a brave face and did my best to keep up with the human dynamo at my side (or, more accurately, just slightly ahead of me). We covered the first five miles in an hour. I've been in traffic jams that moved less quickly, and I felt surprisingly exhilarated at the achievement. As my old bones began to feel the strain, rain clouds began to gather across the Dee estuary and an ominous sense of foreboding gripped me. This woman was clearly on a mission, and any thoughts I had of us perhaps having a rest were repeatedly batted away. "If we stop, you'll never get started again," she said.
Bake in the oven for about half an hour (put a little hole in the top to allow steam to escape). Serve with horrendous amounts of ketchup. Traditionally the rim is on the side not the top and is thicker, but I useless with pastry and was surprised I got this far without totally screwing up!
Tangled in lies,the entertwining of minds; break these walls that I’m trapped within;
Contact me at kate@artimpressions.com for your $10 gift card!
when life was so beautiful and people cared
There's no doubt that the quality of life on offer in Paris is especially high. And I'm not talking the types of dwellings or relative incomes. I'm talking about the French art de vivre - their inimitable way of making the otherwise occasionally pedestrian business of existing into a stylish art form. It's in the frenzy they whip themselves into over a cut of meat, or a glass of wine or a slice of foie gras. It's in the care they take with their appearance, the borderline haughtiness with which they carry themselves and the infuriating smugness with which they consider themselves superior to every other country in the world.
Many unwelcome responsibilities fall to you, and though not easy to cope with, you face up to them and fulfill them to the best of your ability, adding to your overall understanding of life and true happiness. You’re cognizant of the additional strength you acquire with each adversity that you conquer. Eventually these adversities become like water rolling off a duck’s back and never try you beyond your endurance. You’re a great humanitarian and show it every chance you get.
7-INCH HEADREST TFT LCD MONITOR WITH DVD PLAYER
“I’m excited that the collaboration between Street League Skateboarding and my foundation will result in another Safe Spot, Skate Spot in the City of Los Angeles,” said Rob Dyrdek, the Foundation’s Founder and President. Dyrdek added, “We recognize that cities want to help their skateboarders but often lack the necessary funds or space and this concept provides the perfect solution for both. I want to thank Mayor Antonio Villaraigosa, Councilmember Tony Cardenas, and the Los Angeles Department of Recreation and Parks for all of their help in making this possible.”
“Thank you, I’ll keep that in mind. Now we must be off,” said Hermel, and taking his leave with a short bow, took Hornmel with him back up to the street. Hornmel was still finishing off a leg of chicken he’s purchased with his last three tin pieces as they walked.
Anyone else with me?
I hope all the moms, grandmas and actually all women, had a wonderful Mother's Day and were spoiled at least a little bit rotten.
4. Additional shipping fee will be shouldered by the buyer, P50 for Metro Manila, P80 for Luzon, P90 for Visayas and Mindanao.
The Trappist Cistercian monastery of Grottaferrata (moved to Vitorchiano in 1957) was governed by Mother Maria Pia Gulini (1892–1959), an intelligent and discerning abbess with a broad vision of all things Catholic. She corresponded with the Abbé Paul Couturier (1881–1953), the Apostle of Christian Unity. The Italian abbess nurtured a passion for Christian Unity and communicated that passion to her community. Maria Gabriella was receptive to Mother Gulini’s spiritual teaching. Inspired by the Holy Spirit, she asked permission of her abbess to offer her life for the Unity of Christians. The Father accepted her offering, drawing her into the prayer of Christ and into His sacrifice.
Now, where is the main power control?
****--reccommended to adults interested in vampire fiction
Gregory O’Brien
The last one made me want to linger on each moment. Each touch. Each detail of the person. So when the book ended people would look up in the phone book and see if they could find my characters there, because they swore they were real.
There was a natural element in it - something that once opened could not be stopped.
After marrying a fellow psychologist and law student, Elizabeth Holloway, Marston began an affair with his research assistant, Olive Byrne. Holloway did not object. Byrne moved in with them, and Marston fathered four children, two with each mother. Byrne took the role of stay-at-home mom, while Hollway became the family bread-winner. Marston landed a job at Family Circle magazine, but I doubt his employers were aware of the geometry of their psychologist’s own family.
The build quality is also first rate – it would take some serious abuse to harm the Vita, though we’d advise you buy a protective case anyway – a set of keys in the wrong pocket could ruin that lovely screen quicker than you can say “ain’t no Gorilla Glass!”
Maybe she would walk away from him and never come back.
Every day we breathe another breath, we are given another chance to fulfill our purpose… which I believe is doing God’s will. Spirit wants us to be happy, joyous and prosperous. Our self-imposed fear of lack and limitation is what thwarts our growth and ultimately our happiness. The blessings of Easter is an opportunity to rise above these negative beliefs in order to move toward experiencing heaven on earth. It is God’s good pleasure to give you (us) the kingdom (Luke 12:32). The truth is, we don’t have to wait for salvation because it’s already here; available and waiting for your to acceptance of it. While some believe this salvation must come from turning your life over to Jesus, in truth, it doesn’t really matter. The message is still the same. Everyone stands on equal ground when it comes to God. We are all One… connected by our thread of humanity as well as collective intelligence and Spiritual essence. We are “saved” from the human conditions of fear, oppression, pain and even death, to the degree that we embrace our Divine nature just as Jesus did. This the message of Easter; the good news and the blessings of this season!
tights
In this incredible story the unlikely pair fall in love. The mystery surrounding the familiarity they feel toward one another and the impossible quest for a cure to their differences make this book a captivating and fascinating read.
Ok, veering off into a different direction; I had the nicest time on Saturday at Jerry's Artarama Austin. It was SXSW so the crowd in the store to participate in the scratchboard demo was at about 10+, but they were determined and appreciative. A Grandmother brought her 3 Grandbaby girls, 2 sisters and a cousin. The oldest was 6. They had a great time, and I enjoyed working with them. It was cool to see how they took to the process. One of them was hyper-critical of herself and the marks she was making. Grandma helped and I ended up getting a great photo of her with her piece. Finally a smile!
Cholesterol 30mg
There was a sudden short burst of blogging activity earlier this month, when it seemed like I had something new to say every couple of hours. Well, this week, that well has run dry. I haven’t got too much to say, really. Maybe working on “Cassandra” has made my writing gears kick into overdrive, and this means that my cup runneth over with creative fluid (ew) when I’m working on “Cassandra”. But I’ve reached a point in “Cassandra” where I’ve gotten stuck. I know how the story ends, and I know the basic path that I’m going to use to get there. But I’ve hit all the big scenes that I wanted to hit when I made a basic mental outline of the story in my head: the mud wrestling scene, and the underwater Westside Story dance fight scene,* and all the other important ones that I wanted to do. So I’m kind of at a point where the clear path is lost. And because of that, I haven’t been updating my lame blog as much. I’m sorry, to all my followers (all nine of you!).
Talk about emotion in a photo, do you agree?
Too far Gone
Motivation within the ranks of the small (and bigger) helpers was low too.
To enter, all you have to do is tweet this: To celebrate the book birthday of Every Last Kiss by @courtwritesYA, it will be FREE on Amazon Kindle today! http://ow.ly/aoORL
In high school I was:
While going through my novel with a fine tooth comb I noticed a plethora of scenes where the action moves the plot absolutely nowhere. A telltale sign was when at the end of the scene I would wonder, "Why is that in the story and what was I trying to do there?"
Neneh Cherry Buffalo stance S
The General Medical Council has now imposed conditions on Mr Rowland's licence to practise and ruled he must not carry out any urogynaecological surgical procedures.
Handmade flowers.
It's time for our next challenge here at FYI! We had some gorgeous entries from our last challenge, that my Lovelies are going to have a difficult time choosing from, for our next Lovely Lotus award. Thanks so much for all who were able to participate. We're absolutely thrilled to have you join us! Don't forget to check back on the 11th to see who our next Lovely Lotus is.
Life skills are behavioral skills which help us manage our personal affairs responsibly. With these skills we can achieve success in our careers and happiness & joy in our relationships. And we can contribute effectively to our community & society. What more can one ask for!
Here are all the panels sewn together. Now to close it up and complete the circle, line up the two raw edges left, wrong sides together and sew that seam. For a more professional appearance iron and top stitch each seam.
9/29 Los Angeles, CA- Nokia Theater
I did the same with the main character in my book, I loved the word Bow as in the British long Bow so I used that and then I also love the word used to describe a Spanish man of war ship, Gallion.
soooooo lets get crafting.
up—
I enjoyed this book because the Society was an interesting dystopia and because Cassia was a pretty interesting character to follow. Although there wasn’t a whole lot of action or fighting or war or anything in this book, Cassia is a strong, courageous character. She fights in a much quieter way that I liked seeing after reading a lot of very violent dystopias. She learns to write in a society that only uses computers. She memorizes poems that are outside of the Society’s 100 poems list. (The Society has only 100 approved poems, along with 100 approved songs, paintings, etc.) She falls in love with someone she isn’t allowed to. Her rebellions are small, but they mean something much more. She is choosing for herself and that is the biggest no-no in the Society. It seems far more real to me that Cassia would start with small rebellions like these before moving on to outright revolution and Society-toppling.
Tormenting a girl named Terri Jo was my first foray into peer torture, or bullying. We were cabin mates during my second summer at camp, right after finishing fifth grade. We were eleven. Terri Jo was a tad goofy and lanky, not unlike almost every other eleven-year-old girl in the world including myself. She had a mass of untamed curly brown hair on her head and big brown eyes. She was from a small town ten miles from mine and used to trumpet the fact that she and her younger brother had been adopted. “Chosen” she called it. She let on that her parents shuttled her and her brother off to an endless series of camps over the summer. Basically, they spent the entire summer away from home while their parents traveled around. Terri Jo was loud and rambunctious, and always tried a bit too hard to fit in. But my friends and I decided not to let her.
The manuscript was sent off to the editor TODAY.
But you try to do as much as you can within those physical
But then I thought: my readers deserve to know the truth- that I mess up as much as the next person. A lot of my readers email me saying that I'm innovative and creative. Well, you know what comes with that territory? Lots and lots of failed kitchen experiments. lol. My friend Kevin mentioned once that it might be fun to do a "bloopers" entry on my blog, and I guess the idea stuck. hehe. But all things aside, here's the ultimate reason why I decided to post them: those ugly little things were TO DIE FOR DELICIOUS! In fact, they were SO delicious that I felt like they deserved to be mentioned on a blog titled "Delicious Delicious Delicious!" =)
Papers exploring historical and/or contemporary instances in literature and film that compel rethinking of postcolonial theory, politics, and aesthetics beyond collective ties to empire, nation, community. 500-word abstracts by 15 March 2011; Karni Pal Bhati (kbhati@furman.edu).
Allow me to introduce a brand new style of Girl Friday-the facebook team!
There are more Baby-Boomer's getting ready to retire that will cause a crash in the Medicare system. They are NOT handing down their fathers business, farms and legacies – those are for sale so they can continue to vacation and live “the life” their fathers never had and the life their children will never have either.
Wishing all of you a very Merry Christmas and a Happy, Safe, Prosperous New Year!! Let's all hold hands and go into New Year together, leaving all unhealthy, toxic, worry-some, nasty stuff behind, and let our lights shine bright!
In almost any situation, you want to choose something that is unique. This does not mean that you need to find the flashiest dress in the store to call your own. You can, in fact, choose a specific designer, such as Sherri Hill dresses, and be relatively certain that everything available will be fresh and innovative. No matter the designs you choose when looking at Sherri Hill dresses, you will know that you are dealing with quality and class. Just having that much reassurance can go a long way toward boosting confidence.
I'm definitely more stressed. More to do, more to worry about, more places to be. And they're not always bad things. Right now a good word to describe everything in my life is this: MORE. More good, more bad. More work, more help. More stress, more relief. Ultimately, the more is turning me into a much better person.
#11 Jenny H.
I must admit that I am a relative new-comer to grits. I first sampled them during a trip to Texas to visit a dear friend. After a night of oh-so-much fun, we hit the Waffle House for some fortification. I only had eyes for the grits on the menu, and sprinkled with a little sugar and a pat of butter, I scarfed them down with record speed. I was head over heels in love. Fast-forward to my return home and I bought a tub of grits during my next shopping excursion. However, they sat in the pantry for a very long time before I took the plunge to make them myself. The first time was as a base for a pan-seared tilapia and veggie dish. I could have kissed the pot I boiled them in. It really was love.
Life News: A local Planned Parenthood abortion business in California is copycatting the 40 Days for Life campaign, which recently resulted in saving the lives of more than 700 unborn children from abortion. The abortion business has set up its own 40 Days of Prayer for the local abortion center.
Die cut flower and leaves- spellbinders - I think build a rose with a papermania brad to hold together
Thank you very much, Jaroslava!
TK Short for “to come” — I don’t have that information yet but will fill it in later
His other bags are clanking suspiciously but I've pretended I can't hear. He's in the good books for the rest of the week. Well, until Friday.
So these little collectibles,
So that's it, all finished. It's my hope to get the pages bound together and a photo of it up tomorrow in time for the end of the month. I want to thank everyone for keeping up with all my posts and Traci for the inspiration. If you've missed any of my previous posts you can find them here. Now, head on over to Traci's site to see what she's doing for her last day.
I wrote a post quite a while ago describing "My 1st Saudi Wedding" I ever attended here. Of course, no two weddings are ever the same. Each one has its own uniqueness that the bride wishes to include in her special day.
Speaking at the same event, Health Minister Mark Scotland said that a tremendous amount of work and negotiations had gone into getting to the stage where the project was now. He said the project would not only contribute to the wealth of the economy but it would contribute to the health of the country as well.
The painting “Still Life with Meadow Flowers and Roses” by Vincent Van Gogh is pictured under X-ray. (REUTERS)
And in that little space of time....I just wanted to remember her being little. Her telling me all of her dreams and plans for when she grows up.
It’s safe to say that your platform is somewhere in between Paul’s and Tebow’s.
My wife is also a mom, as I pointed out early on, but in some respects, she is a real champion and a fighter. She was diagnosed in 1998 with Multiple Sclerosis, and more recently with breast cancer. She has battled both successfully. And as first lady, she will be able to reach out to people who are also struggling and suffering and will be someone who shows compassion and care.
And that is so far the only ideas I really have that Bioware could use to give closure to the series. I’ll be honest, I dislike the ending and the Reapers explanation greatly – I personally prefer the idea that they harvest organics as there method of reproduction which was suggested by EDI in Mass Effect 2, but that said I doubt they’re going to completely rewrite the ending just to satisfy me. Closure right now would be preferred. Or a playable epilogue. That would be nice too, even though I don’t like the idea that I might have to pay $10 for it.
Why they work: Trading for Youkilis would make sense for the Phillies if two or more of Howard/Utley/Polanco/Rollins are shelved near the trade deadline. Unfortunately for the Phils, this is a very plausible scenario. Philadelphia is in for a divisional dogfight – it looks like Atlanta and Washington are both for real. This could spur the Phillies to make a panicked trade to bolster their stagnant lineup. Acquiring Youkilis would not only fortify their infield, but also afford them the choice of exercising Polanco’s mutual option at season end, and/or pursue a deal with Youkilis. Domonic Brown was the #4 ranked prospect by Baseball America pre-2011, and he was ranked #15 pre-‘10. His value has taken a hit after he struggled in 2011, and he hasn’t really hit his stride yet in 2012. Philadelphia probably isn’t planning on incorporating him into their plans for this season, and this could possibly be a good buy-low opportunity for a blue chip prospect. The Phils also have another highly touted outfield prospect in Jonathan Singleton, so you might be able to convince them to relinquish Brown. If the Phils scoff at Boston’s proposal, Trevor May (#69 prospect pre-’12) is a solid Plan B.
Like a dream,
It was 114 today and several people were unable to come for that and other reasons so they were missed.
Boris Shchukin Lenin in October
Event planners on shore did have the forethought to bring heavy ropes to throw at the raftees whose river experience bordered on none or whose raft chose these moments to shatter like toys.
xrays
* Have knowledge and skill in project management with proven project management experience utilizing a globally recognized project methodology / procedure / processes
Racked: 09-21-2006 (dry-hopped w/ 1oz. Trschitz)
Coming six days after the approval for Flounder Brewing in Hillsborough (Somerset County), Turtle Stone is the second production brewery licensed by the state this year, nudging up the tally of New Jersey craft breweries to 24.
So much emotion and yet not enough; can fit to numerous settings such as laying in the sun or even grieving.
"There were a lot of glamorous looking 'modelly' types with severe expressions. They needed to eat more burgers. The men were small and wore their pants too tight." (Jason's words...)
Attention area adults! After you've had your fill of karaoke and cider at Carroll Park the Brooklyn Bridge Park Conservancy Junior Committee is sponsoring a Halloween party on Saturday in order to raise funds for the free public programming in the park. Free programming is the lifeblood of a great public space - and who doesn't love a good Halloween Party? Details below:
A hotel in Barcelona, a library in Wales, a private home somewhere in Midi-Pyrénées, a pharmaceutical HQ outside Singapore: these and other projects all contain a room.
Immigration restrictions are often defended on the basis of economic arguments. I’ve repeated often enough why these arguments won’t work (see here, here, here and here for example). What I want to do now is spell out one of the strongest economic arguments against immigration restrictions and in favor of open borders, and I mean completely open borders (which doesn’t mean that completely open borders are necessarily the right thing to do; there may be other arguments against completely open borders that override the economic ones in favor).
Necessarily, seekers receive every sort of channeled messages, often short but recognizable. They describe the voice as passing onto their ears, or they are audio messages.
"Requiem For Dizzy Lizzy" is 90,000 words and is my first novel.
So I wonder if Mr. MacKinnon named his secret agent character "Ian," after Ian Fleming, the creator of James Bond, because that would be incredibly clever and super sly, and "Wallace" after William Wallace, the Scottish freedom fighter, because Douglas likes to occasionally mix that mass ass-baring scene from Braveheart into his regular porn rotation of Tijuana Toilet Tramps and Roughin' It.
I'll be snapping many pics of the new shop
The carpets did not last long either. Fires whilst commuting were regular. Luckily, firemen on mopeds patrolled all major routes with buckets of water on panniers. Ahhhhh! the good old days...
When the email comes through, the first thing I do is cross my fingers and hope for that little paper clip icon, the one that tells me that there's a photo attached.
As for the ICR article, what’s new? Nothing much. It’s just another Daily (pseudo)Science update.
Tonight opened up well. Rick Holland spoke about Jesus. He spoke about Jesus being the culmination of God’s Transcendence and Eminence. Transcendence is God’s distance from us, and Eminence is God’s closeness to us.
I moved my Psychedelic Monk in the kegerator but haven't started the force carbonation yet. At least its cold already.
Not all of our jobs are tragic tales of weepy-widows and poor bastards who have had their dicks hung out to dry by psychotic, high-maintnance, fickeled girls. We get all shapes and sizes.
Was the debt that my soul owed.
Paul Valery
On Thursday, we enjoyed a fine day at the park. Mama N suggested a picnic so off we went with our picnic blankets and a football. Our local park is perfect for picnics as it has a huge grassy area where we can just sit and relax and the kids can run about playing football or picking daisies.
3/27: Television; Screening: Deadwood (2004); Reading: Feuer, “Narrative Form in American Network Television” (CV 611-618); Third Response Paper Due
This weekend I tackled a long-procrastinated project— my pallet garden. The pallet, gently lifted from a Whole Foods dumpster by my beloved Alex, sat empty on my balcony for weeks, yearning to be filled with flowers, herbs, and aromatics. To be fair, my procrastination stemmed from a little research at Portland Nursery; at $1.99 a pop, the tiny 2″ starters required for the project would cost me $150+! …not a feasible project, especially for a pallet full of annuals! While I try to support local nurseries, boutiques, and grocers on a regular basis, for this project, I decided to bite the bullet and head over to Fred Meyer, where six-packs of starters were three bucks each.
Understandably wedding plans have taken over our life here at the moment.
I am grateful to the Catholic Church for contributing to that part of my education concerned with soulcraft, which was largely absent in public school and a wider American culture rooted in values that are first and foremost money-oriented. Whatever shortcomings the church as a whole can be blamed for, my local parish at least was the only community in American society (besides my family, relatives and close friends) where I did not feel invisible.
Chapter 6
…They way I touched you with gentle but errant desire.
She made these cute, and delicious, apple pies for her friends in our FIAR group last week. She made a few extras in case some didn't turn out well so Clarence and I got to sample them, too.
02. Instrumental 2 (Studio Demo 81 XYZ)
Yet this show of strength is impotent.
Supreme happiness in marriage is governed considerably by a primary factor — that of the bearing and rearing of children. Too many young people set their minds, determining they will not marry or have children until they are more secure, until the military service period is over; until the college degree is secured; until the occupation is more well-defined; until the debts are paid; or until it is more convenient. They have forgotten that the first commandment is to “be fruitful, and multiply, and replenish the earth, and subdue it.” (Genesis 1:28.) And so brides continue their employment and husbands encourage it, and contraceptives are used to prevent conception. Relatives and friends and even mothers sometimes encourage birth control for their young newlyweds. But the excuses are many, mostly weak. The wife is not robust; the family budget will not feed extra mouths; or the expense of the doctor, hospital, and other incidentals is too great; it will disturb social life; it would prevent two salaries; and so abnormal living prevents the birth of children. The Church cannot approve nor condone the measures which so greatly limit the family.
If you continue walking down the rue de la Commune, on the right hand side of the street, you will find Le Bazar Saint Remois the sister shop to Le Grand Magasin. This is that shop I mentioned - you know the one with absolutely nothing you need but the one with everything that looks totally irresistible. Le Bazar is just that, a little shop where fun items are the stock trade. The perfect shop to stop for something out of the ordinary.
With reedy lengths and necks and undulatings.
she said, as she got into that new white van. 'They can't wait to hear
Miles 20-26: The last 10k is a blur. I had picked up the pace again at Mile 19 and slowed back down at Mile 20 but I had given myself the pep talk that I was still on pace for sub-4. At Mile 20, it was like I crossed the Finish Line. It's so hard for me to put in to words what happened at Mile 20 and through the rest of the race.
Captain Söfring Hansson, ultimately. Vasa’s sinking can also be blamed on the captain. It would have been safer to sail the ship with the lower gunports closed, since he knew the ship was unstable. It might have been possible to redistribute weight in the ship or even rebuild it. If the inquest were held today, the captain would probably be held responsible.”
Bill Something
SECURITY KEEPING FEE: $150.00TOTAL: $150.00
it's this beauty that captivates me. ::drool, drool, drool:: Just look at the collar! I suppose my actual fascination with this coat is because I've had the image of a cape in my mind that has a collar like that. My "dream cape" came about before I saw this, and is actually extremely short and striped. But I want that neck on it!
The thing is, we’re only here to come to terms with something we don’t understand, until we come to terms with it. Our mediums of expression can be violent and duplicitous on the way. All of my fighting styles and defense mechanisms are female, if that rings a bell (just joking!!! …but true none the less). People really ought to study the animal kingdom to get a clue about how power works. For some reason, I’m thinking about the iron fist in the velvet glove; probably no connection there. I wish I could see better. It’s probably right in front of me. Like the guy in the first link, you just don’t get it at the time. It’s what you do about it, when you do get it, that defines you, so, understanding and compassion have a real power in the mix. Not only were you once where they are now but, there but for fortune goes you and I. I’ve mentioned it some several times, life is a spiral staircase, don’t piss over the railing. There is an Escher effect to all of this, for those of you who know a thing or two about Geometry and Trig…especially your ‘shoot around the corners’ theoretical sorts.
Challenges for my card:
** PRAISE GOD! I went out to find that the guy wasn't outside. I asked George where he went. He said, "He has gone to the church for prayers. I think he has had a change of heart." I am soooo blessed to be living such an awesome life for Him. I truly feel like His hands and feet today.
And I know not which I should follow,
The moon will start recovering at 11:02PM as it moves out of the Earth's shadow, but I don’t think I will still be up by that hour, as it has been an abnormally long and hectic day!
Social Networking Ups the Ante
All these arguments are made in my book, in which I also explain how we can defend freedom and oppose Islamization and cultural relativism in a non-violent and democratic way. In fact, that is what my party, the Party for Freedom, is doing in the Netherlands.
In the late 18th century, with the fig leaf of religion shriveling, European intellectuals began to wonder aloud - Who are these rude, uncivilized, aliens who call themselves The Jews? Why do they behave as a nation within a nation? Whatever shall we do with them?
For some reason I thought it would be quirky to put little carrot flags on my cupcakes so that you could tell it was carrot cake. Duh! At this point I would like to name and shame my lovely friend JANE (who is a lawyer type too and perhaps the most intelligent person I know) who asked me whether there were carrots in my carrot flagged carrot cake cupcakes… For the record, yes. There are carrots in the carrot flagged carrot cake cupcakes…. I am assuming this was just a premature senile moment. All is forgiven.
You could love a guy’s hair, but hate the rest of him.
like a violin in its black case.
But back to the on-point-former-sewing-machine-cover. I ended up needing to trim it quite a bit and add borders in order to square it up, but I think I like it even more bordered than without. I think it will eventually become a mini wall-hanging, probably to be hung near my sewing machine.
Tomato soup with rice
My card today is a pretty simple card. It only uses two inks and one was just for sponging purposes.
What I am going to do with this Jesus? I can’t stop him or control him. I can’t resist him. I can’t not follow him.
*In Blood Ties and Blood Ransom, you tackle the controversial subject of genetic cloning. How much research did you do for the subject matter and do you enjoy this part of the writing process? Do you think it’s important to be as truthful as possible or do you give yourself some creative licence?
i was actually lucky to even be able to watch as they skated ...
I guess I shouldn't be surprised that people are interested in this industry. First, because everybody loves chicken. I bet even vegetarians are poppin' Chick-fil-A chicken minis behind closed doors (I'm onto y'all). And second, it is pretty amazing how this business works. I never really thought about what it actually takes to feed 300 million or so people.
See you in a bit.
In what I assume is Nickelodeon's answer to Demi Lovato, Miranda Cosgrove also sings. Naturally, she decided it was imperative that she pollute my airwaves with another rendering of that abortion of Christmas music. And while I'm sure she's a fine singer and all, I just wish that she had chosen...well, anything else.
The “experts” are also wrong to talk about “Americans” as if there were only one kind. Everyone knows that if the lights go out there will be trouble in Detroit but not in Portland, and everyone knows why: Detroit is black and Portland is white. There would be trouble in Los Angeles, too. After the verdict in the Rodney King beating case, just as many Hispanics as blacks rioted.
Mahabharat is one of my favorite mythological books along with Iliad. Somehow I find it more real compared to Ramayana. Although many in India regard Ramayana as “the” book, I personally beg to differ. For me Ramayana symbolizes bondage but Mahabharata unleashing of spirits and thoughts, for someone who does not like bondage much, Ramayana might not excite much (Though I guess that talk might be blasphemous to some. I would just say it is the choice of having something spicier ).
I can not beleive how many of you joined us for our 100th CYP Challenge last week!! As I am writing this post, we have 503 entries!! Thank goodness I will be using random.org to pick all of our winners which will be posted tomorrow!! We will also be announcing our 2 GD members for April, so make sure you check in and see if it is YOU.
Session 1
That article which reports on how radioactive waste is being sold to the industry to salt road for melting snow also makes this point:
But don’t let that stand in your way
“Can’t you see we’ll be in trouble if the idea catches on? We’ll never get our animals to kiss tourists on safari.”
The book is not perfect, but it was the right book at the right time for me. I read it in one sitting, and while I can’t see reading it to the boys at this point, I do think that any book-loving child or adult could find a happy escape into its pages.
slothful
Tx #6
In 1994 at the age of 33, I lost her mother Peni Fadda. I was heartbroken, but knew I still had Coni for solace. Coni was always my rock my stability point. She was so special to me...
I did have a reason for it. I think sometimes, our society focuses too much on winning and losing. Isabel gets to travel to New York City for the contest, which is a dream come true for her. The contest is really just icing on the cupcake. (See what I did there? Huh? Do you? Pretty clever, right?) So, I left it up to the reader's imagination as to what happened at the baking contest.
The peace that Christ gives lasts. His peace is not given with terms. If there is faith, we can have peace. "If you loved me you would rejoice that I am going to the Father, because the Father is greater than I." God the all-powerful Father has great love for us. Just as we have loved Jesus Christ, we can now understand the love that filled Jesus Christ and gave him peace. The peace that the world cannot give calmed Jesus as he offered up his body.
XI. THE MECHANICS OF PROPAGANDA
I can’t so much as admire the flowers in a neighbor’s garden without Miss. Snooty jumping at me. “If only you spent some time on your flower beds, you wouldn’t have to turn green at the sight of someone else’s flower patch,” she admonishes.
“The specialist engineering company hired Pert while he was completing his degree at Waikato University two years ago. At that time its annual turnover was $1.5 million.” A report said.
Here's a link to her blog:
On the second card, I used another rosette. I'm really getting the hang of making them. Especially since I figured out that using hot glue really gets the center to stay down. The little postage stamp shapes were cut using a die and my Cuttlebug.
Ladies, since so many of you insist on addressing men as a monolithic group when it works against us, and likewise address yourselves as a group when it works to your advantage, allow me to honor that from my seat here among the ranks of the so called privileged. Trust me, I would rather just talk to any one of you as an individual human being, but I am not setting the terms here…you are, so I aim to accommodate.
Here is my husband’s plate.
Sight of: The gardens
-Very easy to use
I originally had thought to leave recruitment relatively open for about 4 weeks, but given the success we’ve had to date, I believe it would not be premature to go ahead and narrow the path to guild membership. This means we will be adopting a new recruitment policy that will effectively suspend open recruitment (i.e., stop actively advertising the guild on the server by directly contacting unguilded potential recruits, and posting guild advertisements to channels like Trade, etc.). Such promotional activities are necessary evils, but I think we have reached a threshold of activity that will allow us to suspend those activities, at least temporarily.
You need to sponsor and pass a law regarding the right to freedom of speech. I suggest you mandate every citizen be required to buy a computer and desktop publishing software so that they may exercise their freedom of speech and create newsletters. How about blogs? That way, they won't have to depend on the productive people who already own computers. Similarly, you could mandate we buy Bibles, or the religious document of our choice, so that we can practice our right to freedom of religion.
Duodenum Substances – From the digestive tracts of cows and pigs. Added to some vitamin tablets. In some medicines. Alternatives: vegetarian vitamins, synthetics.
Ethan had chosen to pee in the garbage can because, as he put it, "He couldn't make it to the toilet," which happens to be right around the corner...
Hey, are you guys watching all the Titanic specials going on this weekend? Matthew and I have been watching them on and off, and my terror of all things water related is pretty much nailed in now. Cruise ships, tsunamis, flying over the ocean, wading out farther than knee deep at the beach, jellyfish… all the stuff of my nightmares, I kid you not. This is not helping.
While frantically deciding, "Well... what are we going to ask people to pray??!! A rosary?? A Novena to some Saint? Which Saint?!?! There are too many!!!"...
AC: Do you play before or afterward?
Trying to find a character in the Warcraft universe that I identified with is pretty difficult. Part of the problem is that many of the NPC’s that we come in contact with are heroic, and their exploits are legendary. I also have a strange take on this topic, in that I have two answers. One of my answers revolves around matching my real life personality with someone in game. The other is who my main character is modeled after.
Glad I am feeling better for the weekend as I have a secret mission to complete, more later!! Hope you all have a great weekend.
When I set out to start this blog (yesterday) I was throwing a pebble into the dark pools of the blogosphere water in an effort to watch the ripples (que Aragorn scolding Pippin “Do not disturb the water!” Which is not literally accurate, as it was Boromir who disturbed the waters, and Frodo who questioned him for it. But I digress, and far too quickly). The Initial Poke (my first post) was, well, more like that mosquito that finds itself scattered across your windshield on a summer night. You didn’t hear it, and you’ve got to look very close to see any remnants of its’ existence.
Ver 1. And it came to pass, as he went into the house of one of the chief Pharisees to eat bread on the sabbath day, that they watched him.2. And, behold, there was a certain man before him which had the dropsy.3. And Jesus answering spoke to the Lawyers and Pharisees, saying, Is it lawful to heal on the sabbath day?4. And they held their peace. And he took him, and healed him, and let him go;5. And answered them, saying, Which of you shall have an ass or an ox fallen into a pit, and will not straightway pull him out on the sabbath day?6. And they could not answer him again to these things.
The great flood which had covered the earth for so long had at last receded, and even the thin strip of sand called Rose Spit, stretching north from Naikun village, lay dry.
But I ordered it. And I ate it. I got halfway through and thought "If I throw it out the window now, it will be a half serving instead of a full serving." But I kept eating- figured I could take it to 3/4 of a serving. Then I ate every bite. I felt gross almost right away when my head cleared and I realized what I'd done. Part of me started to imagine pulling over and making myself throw it back up. But I can't make myself throw up- the idea makes my skin crawl.
Rows 1-2: Going away from the joining chs, sc 12, ch 1, turn.
- the earlier expansion had left some land not taken up behind the leading edges and the pushing back of the Xhosa in the early wars in the 19th C had made some land available (however, the 1820 settlers had also been assigned much of that); nevertheless, the voracious appetite for land among trekboers meant that by the 1830s, landlessness had grown. In effect, the on-going migration that had characterised the 18th C had been dammed up for almost 50 years. Thus, the Great Trek can be viewed as the bursting of the dam. Thus, the Great Trek can be seen as merely the resumption of the earlier process.
@Wendell_Howe Wendell Howe is a great spin on a twitter timeline project. Wendell is a fictional character (I think) that travels though time. One day he is in the 25th century and the next he is in 19th century India.
I would also like to thank Michael Jones from the blog My Two Yen Worth. He sent me a bunch of Japanese Godzilla trading cards that I gave to my brother for Christmas. Thanks Michael!
They must not be made to feel inadequate by stick-thin models staring out of advertising billboards and magazines.
I got a situation unfolding and I'm scared for my life.
This is where the problems arise for me.
He storms over like he’s defending the Alamo. Bright red cheeks, wheezing, a cigarette stuck to his lips.
The best part about RC simulations is the addition of the other cool gadgets that add oodles to the complete experience.
As the official website describes it:
The first widely reported murderous act of the Obama Administration in Libya was the assassination of the beloved Libyan leader Moammar al-Gadhafi. The American occupation of Libya is being done by proxy through Al Qaeda followers of American President Obama Bin Laden, who is attempting to impose Sharia Law throughout the globe under the guise of fighting Christian extremism which is slowly dying across the world. Due to the fact that secularism has prevailed in Western societies at large, leaders of Western governments fear that the next step will be the embrace of Marxist atheism, hence they are attempting to now replace the foot soldiers of capitalism with Islamic extremists.
How do you make your muffins? Do you have any secret tips and tricks that make your muffins out of this world?
First, let me say that I could live on finger foods and dips and foods like this. This was great! The husband loved it, but suggested that I add salsa or taco sauce next time. I will definitely make it again, but with this addition!!
This recipe will be a must in the future. Next summer, I will be bringing a lot of canning equipment to Montana. Did you hear that Trout?
The next day, D and I went out to dinner at Tucanos with friends. If you haven't been, it's one of our favorites! It just so happens that I share a birthday with our friend Laird, and Emma's birthday is only one day later!
NOW, we get to the difficult part. Similar to Frodo and the Fellowship which soon became just Frodo and Sam – it was a difficult journey, but doable. With friendship and supplies, energy and hope, they managed. But at some point, they got through the walls of Mordor and stared out at the wasteland in front of them, and up at the looming Mt. Doom.
Surprise your mother with a new dining room set from Ashley Furniture, Coaster or Homelegance. Let her know that she is appreciated in every way. With a new dining room set, there will be more family gatherings at your mother’s house for years to come.
I bite in to the meat, it’s succulent and juicy I can taste that is has been flavoured with garlic, and something else I can’t put my finger on.
Bake tart in pan for 20 minutes or until pastry turns golden brown.
38. Quick Draw McGraw
In one incident, Richardson and White allegedly agreed that Eleby would bring about five kilograms of cocaine through a security checkpoint that was being staffed by White. But when Eleby failed to follow White’s instructions and went to the wrong security checkpoint, TSA officials uninvolved in the scheme seized Eleby’s bag, which was filled with cocaine. In the final incident outlined in the indictment, Richardson and Whitfield allegedly conspired with the DEA’s “confidential source” to allow about eight pounds of methamphetamine to pass through a security checkpoint that was being staffed by Whitfield. After the methamphetamine went through security, Whitfield met the confidential source in an LAX restroom to receive $600 in cash, which was the second half of the agreed-upon $1,200 fee for that pass through.
Everyone is familiar with this story of the two men walking with Jesus and not recognizing Him. How true that is in our lives every day. Jesus is with us always. It is only when we invite Him into our hearts that we see that He has been there all of the time. How many times have you longed to be with Jesus only to discover later that He had been with you even in the darkest of times?
He’s hilarious. The reaction was totally justified, though – misono dominated the song. Could Yasuda-kun win one for the Kanjani side against the tough odds? Well, let me put it this way – there were no foregone conclusions in this thing until the final scores were revealed, and Kanjani8 take their music seriously.
Fourth, LinkedIn makes it convenient to stay in touch and informed about the members of your network. It isn’t true that you will always know a contact’s e-mail or phone number. Each time a business person changes positions or moves around, their phone number and e-mail address can change. If they regularly update their profile, you will always have the latest contact information.
Lets consider the sort of people who you would be expecting to be in hell. Most good comedians, your atheist friends and Christopher Hitchens. I would much rather be sitting around with those guys for eternity than Benny Hill.
But, seeing as how its Home School – this is a pretty not-so-strict schedule. If we want to go for our field trip on Wednesday, no problem! If we sleep in late and don’t get to the lessons until after lunch, no problem! Ah, the joy of Home School. :)
PS - The IT Crowd. How good is it?! I fear that is how my life will end up, some day...
Lyla Garrity (Minka Kelly): Cheerleader and girlfriend to starting quarterback, Jason Street. She’s portrayed as being the “good girl” type who tries to do right by everyone and everything.
Invest and enjoy a classic look for many summers ahead.
Or perhaps Bâri′ was taken to Indonesia in early October 1961, at nearly age two, when Sukarno was in New York City at the United Nations General Assembly.
revenge on those who have wronged her.
thrash against the windowpanes
Also, Robert Kearns, the inventor of intermittent windshield wipers who won multimillion-dollar judgments against Ford and Chrysler for using his idea, has died. He was 77.
but did you hear that noise
-Merrell. The answer is no.
Anywho, I woke up Sunday morning and went straight to the kitchen to get The Hubs some coffee. Once I had been vertical for about two minutes, I knew I had to pee, but wanted to wait until I got the coffee ready.
This was a prolific time for Crosby in New York. In between his shows in Brooklyn Crosby traveled to Manhattan to wax some of his most classic recordings: “St. Louis Blues” with Duke Ellington and "Shine” with The Mills Brothers; and his signature ballads, “Starlight” and “Paradise.”
In another vein, I had become interested in alternative ways to teach my son how to write an essay. I can remember 30 years ago, mind-maps were beginning to be the rage in special ed classroom. I could never quite understand what they were. We used Roman numerals and the alphabet to give structure to our notes, our papers--making an "outline" was key. The mind map is a very different, and very visual way to structure a paper. (You do know most bright kids in special ed are there because they don't learn the way schools teach.)
differentiators
- I LOVE yogurt and it is a favorite snack for both of us. My colleague at my last job MADE his own yogurt and brought some in (yum). Here is a tutorial for how you can make your own yogurt.
Anyways, enough with the blah blah, how about some pictures of the new playroom?! Aaryan absolutely loves playing in it----he will all 'adult-like' come and tell me he is going to go play in his "animal room" before proceeding up the stairs. I think he calls it his "animal room" because of the bucket of stuffed animals in there... ;-)
Jen (Beantown Baker) and Cara (Cara’s Cravings), two Boston area food bloggers, have teamed up for a project called Bloggers Bake for Hope, a virtual bake sale as part of Bake for Hope. Bloggers will donate their choice of baked goods, which will be auctioned off between May 4-6th. Jen and Cara set a $2000 goal for the auction - and they need your help!
PS For non-British readers, the titles of this post and the previous one are an oblique reference to this book.
“Now then, John,” Casey sat on the low armchair in the corner and crossed her chubby legs, “tell me, do you love your wife?”
Train
I. am. going. insane.
Van Dieman Jacobs Ladder Amber 330ml $4.50 – English style amber ale, rich caramel & toffee malt, with a touch of citrus fruit hop aroma.
If you are going to eat fruit, eat it sparingly and opt for berries which are relatively low in sugar and offer a better deal in terms of nutrient content. Avocados are also a good choice given the high good fat content. Every day fruit: apples; peaches; pears; plums; citrus fruits – eat these in moderation and by that we mean watch your body and how it reacts. High sugar tropical fruits (pineapples, mangoes, paw-paws, passion fruit) : these should be avoided until you hit your weight loss targets And don’t eat dried fruit, period!
As I have mentioned previously, I don’t really think they can do this because if I’m not mistaken, members of the Kedah assembly are ordinary people and not God.
So Micah was packed and ready to go to Grandma's. And he couldn't get me out the door fast enough. His suitcase was already in the van and everything. I told him that he needed to come get changed first, and he's shockingly compliant on things like that if he thinks it'll get me to move in his direction faster. He was upstairs and choosing new duds in no time. Except I had duds already laid out for him to put on, like his soccer shirt, black shorts, and socks that could eat his legs all the way up to his boxer shorts, then fold down and lick the remains all the way back to his ankles.
Flavor: Chocolate with Ganache
Going down the hallway, I passed the glassed-in humidity control rooms with robots (and I believe it is where they are developing the zombies) to my left. This area reminds me of the Hive in Resident Evil, only not filled with zombie water. Yet.
Some of the names on ‘ze list’ are familiar to me others are not. One that sticks out is Tony Ward. Tony you might recall is the long term activist who put himself in harm’s way during a fund raising event for the party and got his head smashed with a hammer by UAF thugs.
And about the ninth hour Jesus cried out with a loud voice, saying, “Eli, Eli, lema sabachthani?” that is, “My God, my God, why have you forsaken me?” Matthew 27:46
The conference was marvelous. Jerry and his friend, Senna, hosted a Pokemon funshop that was a big hit.
Bierbrouwerij De Koningshoeven B.V. La Trappe Quadrupel (Koningshoeven / Dominus)
LMDO: Laughing My Dentures Out
It seems like when it comes right down to it, weddings are basically a pain in the ass and if you have one, it’s going to cost you a shit-load of moolah. Just ask Steve Martin.
When asking for a flexible schedule to care for her children, Georgia tells Riley that “this job is all about flexibility.” Another nice pun.
Okey doke. Back to sneezing and complaining.
One drink I didn’t get to at the time was advocaat, a venerable Dutch egg liqueur that's not dissimilar to eierlikör, but which comes in two forms. The first, more familiar to Americans, Britons, and others outside the Netherlands, is a pourable, eggnog-like drink. Such “drinking” advocaat is for the export market and would not pass muster among old-timers in Amsterdam, Groningen, or Delft. On the contrary, domestic Dutch advocaat traditionally has been a boozy, custardlike concoction served in small cups and eaten with spoons. Both, however, have their devotees.
emotional pistons of guilt and compassion.
The above is most easily accomplished with the use of an absentee ballot. Do not actually write on the official form, but we are thinning down the selections, so now all the incumbents are OFF THE LIST.
What more could I ask for?
We all have fabric lying around (tons of it!) and we can all sew so all it takes to join the fun is a bit of your time. I'm happy to co-ordinate and post all the dresses if they are sent here. They need to go to the charity in America and they then get delivered by hand to children who need them.
There is more but I fell the duct tape slipping so I better stop for now and let the blood pressure come down.
Anyway, today I have two aprons to show you.
If Mitt can’t stand up to a sick little Nazi like Bryan Fischer, how is he going to do against Iran or North Korea or China or Russia?
Shoot the bull
Terrified, Kira doesn't know what to do until Simon, a good-looking senior with a slightly dangerous reputation, reveals that he and Kira are both mindjackers, rare people who can control thoughts. He teaches her how to use her ability to fool everyone into thinking she's a normal mind-reader, and warns her that no one can ever find out what she really is. Tormented by the lies, Kira pushes her family and Raf away, spending time with Simon instead. After all, Simon is the only person who really understands her.
And make sure with children and those adults who cannot apply it to themselves, that you assist in the application of sunscreen
26th April marks the 25th anniversary of Chernobyl. The incident at Reactor Number 4 was, and may well remain, the worst atomic accident the world has every seen.
and it comes and it goes.
viscous shadows, & the family asking,
I went to the library this evening to get some writing done. I am SO close to finishing my second manuscript! Sooo close, but not quite done. This second book is about pregnancy and childbirth and I'm stuck on the part about delivery. I just keep thinking about things Joe did (or didn't do) that made me want to throw a bedpan at him while I was in labor. I don't think that'll make for a great chapter.
This just makes so much sense to me as a structure, I sometimes feel guilty for having to be shown it. Of course I want my students to be independent, and of course they need to see and experience what I'm asking them to learn and of course there is an inbetween. Gradual Release also helps me keep focused on those big goals that I want the most, the problem solving and communication. It helps me with instruction because I better know what kind of responses are available for where I assess a student to be. A few classes have gotten to the point where they knew this for themselves; "could we get a demonstration of this?" That's an awesome place to be.
In the end, the BMA accepted the views of the Proctologists, and will leave the final decision to those a**eholes in Westminster.
It seems churlish to say this movie looks beautiful, is richly allusive, elegant, Proustian in tone and mode – when these qualities are the last thing that any male in the audience will appreciate.
But I did want to post a couple of things that I have "discovered" recently and wondered why I ever cooked without them.
Who could you become? Be honest. Now, start to be who you might have been. It’s never too late.
Having the player come up with an instinct, a gut reaction to a given situation, allows them to have that in the forefront and puts role-playing to the forefront.
Gram was making French toast and oatmeal. We ate and talked. On the table was my voter’s registration card, with my full name.
So one lovely day last week we strolled into one of our local Chipotle restaurants for lunch.
Inhibitions are weights, snares, hindrances to fulfilling our divine destiny, don’t give it room! Destroy your inhibitions!
At the athlete meeting the night before the show, I was terrified. My only goal for the show was to look like I belonged on stage, but when I saw the other athletes I felt WAY out of my league and completely intimidated.
I started with winter, which is a bit ironic in that I tend to want to hibernate and not do anything productive at all in winter. To some people winter means snow sports and fun and exhilaration, to me it means dark and cold with lots of blankets and very little activity. So, that is exactly what I drew.
OH and Youngest LB were talking about her skin being different, and the fact that there are many ways in which people can look different from each other. This lead them on to discussing whether appearance mattered. LB said that some people might not want to be her friend because of her skin; OH agreed that was true, but added that anyone who used someone's appearance (or disability) as a reason not to like another person, probably wasn't worth being friends with anyway. LB agreed. OH said that you can't make people like you. LB agreed. OH said "I like you. Because you're interesting, and funny, and clever, and I like how you think about things." LB said "And I look nice too." OH agreed.
When I once lived in paradise
Well again I don’t know for certain if it is the Horst Wessel song or the Hitler youth anthem. I believe it is one of Wagner’s tunes. Ride of the Valkeries or something. For heavens sake, it doesn’t matter, it’s not important?
we’re on east coast, then we’re on west coast, have you seen any men like us?
How to make it:
I hadn't realised that British forces had fought in the Balkans during WW I. I would tell you more, but it's such a complicated and confusing campaign I don't have the space. Or the inclination, if I'm honest.
The communication specialist stopped a few feet from Wei, giving him a moment to return from his reverie, and then saluted. Wei returned the salute without standing.
Congrats Jen! We'll be in touch via email to arrange shipping on your earring/hair clip set.
The Milagro Beanfield War (David S. Ward and John Nichols)
Lately there has been so many people falling sick or dying that I heard about and I just had this fear of I got to live now!
You know, the more you smell it the smoother and more complex than American beers it becomes. It's fairly obvious, in fact. Also unlike many of the brash American versions, the malt retains some of its characteristics and there's a good roasted malt flavor that comes out a few seconds after each sip. The whisky hits first, of course, but it fades to the roasted flavor, which lingers a bit and then it finished pretty clean for an oak aged stout.
The Blueshirts then struck again. Rising up as if on que, the Rangers' leading regular season scorer cashed in on a crafty play. Marian Gaborik netted his first goal of the second season with three and a half minutes to go in the second period. After a fake, a hesitation, and some fancy stick handling, Gaborik slipped an (unassisted) puck passed Craig Anderson for a 2-0 Rangers lead.
If you're being stubborn, you might need to pay attention to what's really not working. But even more important, study God's Word and listen for His still, small voice. Proverbs 14:15 says, “A simple man believes anything, but a prudent man gives thought to his steps” (NIV).
Though I always wanted to do something with kids…I had forced myself to give up the dream because I wanted to protect the kids. As Harry Potter once said ’What if something had gone wrong inside of me?” I didn’t know at one point whatever it all was I didn’t know if I could control it. So I isolated myself away from my dreams instead. I had kept a journal at the time that is no longer in existence where all throughout there were pages where I had written out for help. That I needed help and I didn’t know how to stop. (all the thoughts, suggestions, masturbation, viewings on the computer, the fantasy chatting with random people in chat rooms that had been introduced to me from one of my good friends) There was so much written.. when I had relooked through it once, that I didn’t even remember writing it. I remember being confused when I looked at a few pages…Did I write that? But all that aside. I didn’t believe because of all that I had done…I could now longer be what I had wanted to be.
Cass and I just went and met photographer and friend Mark Hunter (the cobra snake) and model Tallulah Morton at his house in West Hollywood. We are so excited to do a shoot with them on Thursday in Malibu, we can hardly contain ourselves. The shoot is for Mirage magazine and we are going to use lots of Wildfox T shirts and take lots of fun summery girly photos.
Islay is also very well know for its single malt whisky, and once a year at the end of May, they have the Feis Ile – the Islay Festival of Malt and Music. This is a week long festival, during which the distilleries open their doors for tours and tasting.
Doctors stabilised Joe and he was fitted to a Berlin heart.
With the clock ticking towards launch date, the anticipation is killing us! We cannot contain our excitement too much longer. Thank you to everyone who has been following us along the way! Without your support none of this could be possible.
These tablecloth is hand knotted - it takes 3-5 weeks to make it. I am not sure when next one will be available.
I’ve been thinking about words a lot lately. Particularly words that have similar sounds but entirely different meanings or words that sound and are spelled the same but mean something different. Words communicate and if one doesn’t have the right words, it’s hard to get the point across. It all started when one of my friends was recalling a recent trip to the emergency.
9:00 a.m. GMT: The rain has subsided, not enough to wash the dust off the bottom-most leaves on the mango trees. So far there’s no information from any sources to contradict the CNRDRE claims of control, though one rumor claims that the junta has been broadcasting its televised message via an ORTM mobile unit and is not actually in control of the ORTM studio. I haven’t yet ventured out to assess the situation in my neighborhood, but everything seems calm. Al Jazeera English is backing up the junta’s position that a “counter-coup” has been successfully repulsed.
You can imagine, then, that Torpedo was greeted with a little anticipation. To add to it--if that's possible--Torpedo is an IPA, perhaps the most-popular and most overexposed craft style in the country. So how do you achieve originality when, in the intervening three decades since you last went out on the line with a regular beer, 1500 American breweries have made just about every style on the planet? It's quite a condundrum: brew something distinctive, worthy of your status as the country's most-popular brewery, but also something your broad fan base will recognize and appreciate. Familiar, but not too much so.
We address Scripture in a number of ways. When our children were younger, we had the ICB Bible on CD (read by kids), we read Bible story books to them, and we talked often about Jesus.
Indulging in my self-defeat
Him: No really you’re beautiful, from head to toe.
Wilkes-Barre, PA
Here, Lee’s wearing a Jessica Simpson Shearling Vest, Anne Klein Brown Leather Boots, Vintage Cashmere Sweater and Zara Jeans. We should probably mention that over the years, Lee has become an expert vintage shopper. She never seizes to surprise us with unique accessories, which (unfortunately for us) were purchased at vintage shops around Toronto, and can never be found again.
There are rules in the land of the living as well; rules which would have Roger hanged for witchcraft if he was ever caught. But refusing to cross over isn't an option. His uncle depends on Roger to hide under the table in their fairground act, listen to the recently bereaved asking questions of their dear departed, and then cross over to find the answers. It's a hard way of life, made all the harder as his uncle's fists usually provide the trigger for Roger to cross over.
2) The fan was shitty. It would overheat after only 30 minutes and use my thigh as it's own personal flesh griddle.
through this:
Who should come to her aid but ghost Bobby, who errs on the side of Vengeful?
Owen is feeling so much better! Nothing ever came of his tummy xray last week and the vomiting subsided. It never seizes to amaze me that for the six weeks post anesthesia, he has major GI issues and one day they just end. He is back to his full feeds and feeling great! He has been taking afternoon naps some days, but I think it's just the heat making him tired. I know it's been wiping me out too!
In 2007, consumer confidence crashed and so did the real estate market in the Boise area. Home prices fell hard for 5 years, giving up all the gains during the bubble and more.
I would tell them to be self-motivated. Or as my mentor told me in grad school, the three things any successful artist needs are: curiosity about the world, ambition, and the ability to be self-critical about your own work. I think that sums it up better than I ever could.
11. A flood 4:38
off the St. John's River.
There are many reasons children do not like school. Not all of them are life threatening, but each of them needs to be taken seriously. As a parent it is your job to advocate for your children and make sure that their needs are being met. The school system is focused on test scores and managing behavior, not on making sure your children are having their needs met. Having spent six years volunteering in public school classrooms I can assure you that meeting the diverse needs of 25 children in one classroom is not possible. Living in a world where many children go to before and after school childcare, as well as spending over six hours a day in the classroom, very few children are getting even their most basic needs met. If your child is not one of the daycare kids, they are still in a classroom with children who spend up to twelve hours of their day in the care of someone other than their parents. The behaviors caused by the unmet needs of these children consume the time and energy of their teachers.
Although I was a bit pissed, it only took a couple minutes to clean off the creamy graffiti scattered throughout my bathroom. I was actually more upset about my now-empty bottle of shaving gel, realizing how my scruffy look was beginning to take a turn for "homeless."
Art is all about failure — drama, comedy, whatever — you go to the theatre, movies, wherever to watch people fail and fight. Failure makes comedy funnier and drama, well, more dramatic. Failure needs to be embraced and encouraged. You can’t be an artist unless you are honestly more-than-willing to fail.
In the meantime, I am trying to figure out how to encode my photos so no one can steal them right off the site anymore. Any clues from code-savvy friends are most appreciated.
"Having a sister is like having a best friend you can't get rid of. You know whatever you do they will still be there" - Amy Li
Order a second drink.
Just when you think you have met the most beautiful woman, another one shows up and overturns the tables.
Mix in the flour and stir till you form a smooth batter.
After my dignity was called into question, we made our way to the “lavender” room where we drank some organic starfruit/unicorn placenta infused green tea and waited for our facials. I had never gotten a facial before, and was slightly about the ”extraction phase”, where they use the jaws of life to yank blackheads out of your face, but also excited about the part where they put cucumbers over your eyes. Don’t ask me why, but I’ve always wanted to experience this. It just seems so luxurious and Pretty Woman-esque.
(doesn't Brady look like a garden knome here?)
Gee i'm so pleased it has finally stopped raining, if only for a couple of days, as H has come home twice this week with his PE kit on, as he had either jumped in a puddle or fell into a muddy patch and it's been a nightmare trying to get his clothes washed and dried !!!
jófríður (and ásthildur who is with you in mind)
When the crew got home from church we got into cleaning gear for the day. The girlies emptied out the cabinets and sorted out the plastics, utensils, cookware. We recycled a lot of old mismatched pieces and gathered and stored cups that were too babyish. Sounds simple, but it was a lot of work! We went through a lot of accumulated kitchen gadgets that we don't use and set them aside to try to sell.
I should also mention that each item comes with a different darling vintage looking necklace.
How this all came to be
This is our family's all time favorite fruit salad.
I fear that thousands of younger persons enter Christian service from no higher motive than to help deliver God from the embarrassing situation His love has gotten Him into and His limited abilities seem unable to get Him out of.
By a kick in the ribs or a pat on the head.
Back in July, Caylee's grandmother Cindy Anthony initially made a frantic 911 call to report that her daughter's car smelled like a dead body. She later said the scent just as easily could have been that of rotting pizza.
Is blueberries.
Best Uses: House Cats, Special Playtime, Leave Around The House
THE WOMAN was raped while on holiday in Dubai but when she reported it, she was arrested instead. The 23-year-old British woman of Pakistani decent, who is said to have accepted her boyfriend’s marriage proposal during a three-day break. They were celebrating and drinking, and she ‘admitted drinking too much’. The waiter, believed to be Syrian, followed her into the bathroom and raped her while she was half conscious. So after admitting ‘illegal drinking’ outside a licensed premise, she was arrested for THAT as well as having sex outside marriage. She was sharing a hotel room with her fiance who was also charged with the same offences. So the newly engaged couple was thrown into jail, and no heed was paid to her report of rape. After being locked up, she told a cell mate she was terrified that the rapist had made her pregnant or had given her a sexually transmitted disease. She was given access to proper medical checks and a morning-after pill only after an appeal from the British embassy staff.
What is being done with all those shark fins? They usually end up in soup. Shark fin soup is a famous Chinese soup, with a history extending back centuries to at least the Ming Dynasty, if not older. Originally, it was a rarity, prized by Emperors and the very wealthy because it was very expensive and required extensive preparation. Though it has expanded beyond that elite, it generally still is seen as a luxury item, a requisite for special occasions such as weddings and grand banquets. It is considered a symbol of wealth, honor, prestige and power. Interestingly, shark fins are basically tasteless and they are embraced more for their texture.
We take a forever-vow to Hold them, yet we can't hold our children in our grasp forever.
Sorry I haven't been blogging. Long story short, I am working really hard on losing the end of my baby weight (and working on approaching my long-term body health goals) and it just doesn't make for the most interesting food-related conversation. Basically every post would look like:
Actually it all started because we desperately needed to do something about our anchor chain getting rustier and rustier. Going on four years of nearly constant anchoring, the chain was getting bad. The solution is to either buy new chain or get the old chain re-galvanized. A new chain in the States would run over $1000.00 dollars and then we would have to get it here. Here in Mexico, you would be hard pressed to find the right type of chain and the quality would be suspect. Anchor chain comes in specific sizes that fit the gypsy on the windlass, which hoist the chain and anchor off the bottom. For all those reasons, re-galvanizing was the right thing to do. Anyway, to ship it with a local trucking company, have it acid-bathed and dipped should cost about $250.00, so it seemed a no-brainer. There is a galvanization plant in Mexicali, Mexico up near the border that can "dip" our chain in a vat of hot molten galvanization and make it like new.
Was it Yogi Berra who said you can learn a lot by just watching? Well, you can also learn a lot by reading books that explain how others survived their individual journey through life. They are frequently entertaining and often inspiring, but they always open a door to other’s experiences that can prove useful to your own life choices.
151. View From the Cherry Tree, The: Willo Davis Roberts
Great Egret 1
What is wrong with Cinderella, anyway? “It’s just, honey, Cinderella doesn’t really do anything”, says Orenstein. Cinderella, Ty Girlz, American Girl, and Bratz do have a common denominator – they are all pretty. In fact, some are sizzlin’, know how dress to impress, and admit to being shopaholics (I once shopped for 12 hours straight!). Apart from promoting “shopping as the path to intimacy between mothers and daughters”, does this also teach our daughters to value their appearance above everything else?
This was the reason for Jesus, the Lamb of God, and His sacrifice on the cross. The only thing that can satisfy the judgment of sin demanded by God’s holiness is the shedding of pure, innocent blood. And only Jesus’ blood met this high standard.
Roland
REASON FOR DEMANDING RECALL OF JAMES CROOKER, CAMMANN ROAD DISTRICT COMMISSIONER, AS PROVIDED ON RECALL PETITION:
I wish someone used some common sense before expanding the definition of illegal content. Someone probably re-read the CoC over the weekend and saw “phone number” mentioned, so all phone numbers are now banned. Even though, it’s a hell of a lot easier to blindly ban all phone numbers than to use your brain to differentiate between advertising and personal information that doesn’t mean it’s the correct approach. Hopefully this will all blow over in a few days, but I doubt it.
By this, and this only, we have existed
Thanks for stopping by again! I always appreciate your visits and your comments! See you soon!
Still 100 posts is something to be proud of so I want to thank you all for being so kind as to pop by for all, most or the occasional few of those 100 and I hope to see around here for the next 100.
It is amazing how simple and warm the people are, welcoming us into their humble homes, sometimes talking to us as if they had known us all their lives. The villages of Manikgonj are beautiful, green and clean, with fields of masoor, paddy and maize. The week in the village is a fresh respite, away from the hustle and bustle of noisy Dhaka, it is a great opportunity to see how the Grameen bank works in reality, and to form your own opinions about various aspects of their operations and principles.
The 101 picks right up with a nice, spicy rye nose. The nose is so full of rye spice that it's much closer to LDI or one of the Canadian straight ryes than your typical 51% Kentucky rye. Think pine, brine and the kitchen spice cabinet (you know, that blend of all the spices in there). The palate doesn't disappoint with its rye strength either. It's less sweet than the versions I recall from years past but full of punch. It starts with a big rye hit with a touch of sweetness, gets a bit soapy mid way through and then trails off into a hot rye finish. Water brings out some bitter notes, so I say leave it out.
In 2004, South Africans could only gawk in stunned amazement at the spectacle of hundreds of ANC regime apparatchiks, led by His Excellency Comrade Glorious Leader Tarboy Mbeggi, flying off to celebrate the 200 year “independence” celebrations of an obscure & insignificant little island in the Caribbean. Even a SA Navy warship made its way there, with the SAS Drakensberg throwing anchor just off the Haitian coast, just in case our ruling kleptocracy had to get their portly black arses out of there in a hurry. Most had never even heard of Haiti before, nor could anyone fathom what possible links existed between South Africa and this veritable squatter camp of an island. Millions of rands of mostly White-generated taxpayer money was blown on this outrageous ditty. The sycophantic Azanian media dutifully reported on this shit hole in the sun, pattering on in grave tones about its significance to South Africa’s currently advantaged black elite.
N- writes, ‘I am of the opinion that only experience… can entitle us to participate in the discussion of such higher questions of rank, lest we talk like blind men about colors– against science the way women and artists do…’ I see here N- saying: I will now ‘philosophize’ about ‘science’ but I have license to do so as I have ‘experienced’ ‘science’. He writes, ‘My memory– the memory of a scientific man, if you’ll forgive me– is bulging with naivetes of overbearing that I have heard about philosophy…’ I think that N- is here casting himself as the philologist viewing the happenings in ‘philosophy’ from outside, ‘Most frequently I found among young scholars that what lay behind the arrogant contempt for philosophy was the bed aftereffect of — a philosopher to whom they now denied allegiance on the whole without, however, having broken the spell of his cutting evaluation of other philosophers…’ I think this is a very interesting diagnosis, and probably has much to recommend it. I think N- is pointing out a tendency among philosophers to heavily inflect their work with denouncements of most other philosophers, clearing the ground for what they will put forth by laying waste to the history of the discipline (almost the opposite strategy to much of scholarship and science!). So, perhaps some of those people who ‘know just enough to be dangerous’, read Hegel or someone like that and buy in when they’re young. As they grow, they grow apart from their philosophical mentor. However, in this process of abandonment of the Hegelian thesis, they neglect to similarly undermine Hegel’s polemics, leaving them feeling against the whole of philosophy; because what ‘philosophy’ means to them is: All that garbage that Hegel proved wrong, plus Hegel who I have proven wrong!
Special thanks go to that handful of players who showed up week after week, season after season, to submit themselves to my maniacal meanderings. It is to these hardcore few that I owe my run, long and fun as it was. At this point I should begin a list of names of those whose presence kept me coming back for so long, but I am notoriously bad with names, and have to choose between remembering their character names or their people names.
Or perhaps, it’s a couple’s not so ideal wedding location. Once the toasts have been drunk and the engagement excitement has died down it’s time to start serious wedding planning. Original romantic thoughts of the dream wedding suddenly give way to the realization of planning a wedding in a town filled year round with tourists making everything more expensive and limiting the rooms available in many hotels in the area.
I can pretty much talk about my family all day long.
Here's what I put together--
However, although the singer and guitarists clearly style a lot of their material on this band, this isn’t necessarily a band thing. They seem to have sculpted their own sound out of others in a very explicit way- the material is unique and that it matches up to the quality of those who inspired it just goes to show the quality of performance we’re talking about here. The key difference would have to be that these guys throw in some bass-heavy programmed drumming alongside the amazing skills of their own live drummer. The end result is a sound that’s halfway between Wild Beasts and Boxcutter.
take baby out of car seat. straighten up. feel baby's entire weight heaving onto your arm (said baby grunting with the physical effort).
FIVE THINGS I AM GRATEFUL FOR TODAY:-
More from Caroline Wyatt
So: was it art? Here, I have to shrug my shoulders and say, 'dunno'. And I don't really care, either, if I'm honest. I enjoyed it. My wife enjoyed it. My children enjoyed it. Thousands of people from all over the world enjoyed it. And I've never, in any exhibition at any museum or art gallery I've ever been to in my entire life, laughed out loud as often as I did at Banksy vs. Bristol Museum. Given all that, does it really matter whether or not I know what the correct label for it is?
As a huge fan of The Gays myself, I'd rather not support somebody who I think is hateful against them.
Summarized article for your convenience :
“Shad-up with the retarded noises and pass me the papers.”
A steward’s remark: “I hear that we have struck an iceberg but there is nothing the matter,” did nothing to reassure Lucy, and while Cosmo went up on the bridge to investigate, she unlocked her security box and took out a pair of diamond earrings, a diamond necklace and turquoises. He came back somewhat shaken and urged her to dress.
Sea Shepherd’s call-to-arms followed more than a week’s worth of outrage from groups opposing the plan to lethally remove up to 92 California sea lions from the Bonneville Dam area in an effort to protect salmon.
I went on vacation last month, so I did a little more reading than usual (3+ books during the vacation week), and also most of it was of the lighter variety. I am a big believer in vacation reading. The perfect vacation book doesn’t tax the brain too much but makes you want to keep turning those pages, since one of my favorite vacation activities is lying in the sun and reading, and that’s no fun with a boring book.
All hobbies and crafts are cyclic. The Victorians did scrapbooking, although it was somewhat different- but the word has been around for almost 200 years. Quilting comes and goes as a major activity, as does embroidery, knitting, etc. The crafts that appeal most, those that make something of lasting beauty or value, always come back into vogue. Even when they are out of style, there are always the faithful who continue to participate and pass it along to the next generation. So, scrapbooking will survive and depending on our ages, some of us might even see it come back once again as the dominant activity in the crafting world. But, in the meantime, it seems that everyone is beading and making jewelry right now.
Amanda here... Popping in with some inspiration for some simple layout ideas... all you need to do is... ADD DUSTY ATTIC CHIPBOARD!!! Head over to RES all weekend for ideas from the CT and don't forgot... 10% off DA chipboard! YAY!!!
Robert P. Devitt, 36, Plainsboro, N.J.
13 goal
In 2002, a team from Flanders University invented new jet lag sunglasses equipped with a vision device that used light to stimulate travelers’ brains.
What was a bad idea was the way I went about it. Effectively - although I was too dim to realise this until it was pointed out to me - I was offering prizes for votes.
So, I drove to the mall and walked into the drugstore. When I walked in, from the corner of my eye I saw this old lady passing me by. She was obviously staring at me, she didn't even try to hide it. I didn't mind it, went straight to the aisle I needed when I heard this weird metallic bang behind me. The lady drove her shopping cart in one of the boxes outside the store with shampoo or shower gel in it ^^ She didn't accidentally hit it when she tried to go around it, no, it was a full on collision! I had to cover my mouth so I wouldn't laugh out loud. I mean, I heard of car accidents because the driver stared at a Lolita but car accidents can be really sucky and not funny. This was HILARIOUS! The look on her face... I really wish y'all could have seen it!
In the next few months we will all see some crazy, fun and exciting things as I share & develop some of
Included in the hold are 2 bows, 2 carnations, 2 frames, 2 ribbons, 1 anchor, 1 banner ribbon, 1 beer mug, 1 bracelet, 1 captains wheel, 1 Celtic clover chain, 1 Celtic cross, 1 claddagh, 1 clover doodle, 1 coins, 1 fabric, 1 four leaf clover, 1 glitter, 1 honey clover, 1 horseshoe, 1 Irish flag, 1 Irish mouse, 1 Irish Rover, 1 Irish whiskey, 1 knit cap, 1 luck of the Irish, 1 netting, 1 pipe, 1 rainbow, 1 shamrock corner, 1 shamrock scatter, 1 shamrock swirl, 1 sheltie, 1 shoe, 1 splash, 1 swirlie, and 1 tag.
The support this amazing project gives takes many forms: hats, booties, and blankets for all the tiny new babies in the NICU to give warmth and comfort to preterm and critically ill infants and their families; blanket sleepers are given to every baby before they go home, and the nurses use them as a tool to teach safe sleeping practices recommended by the American Academy of Pediatrics (http://www.thepreemieproject.com/TPP_Programs/blanket_sleepers); family support (this is where we come in!); and bereavement and memory boxes for those babies whose life here on Earth have already ended.
Lazy Citizen called Townsville Police to report that Name-A-Store was using up spots that were close to the side entrance doors causing Lazy to walk further than normal. When asked to clarify what was using up space, it was the outdoor flower display. Never mind that the flowers look pretty, Lazy didn't want to buy any of them and didn't want to be bothered by that crap either. Lazy then requested to file a complaint against the store and wanted an officer to enforce the parking laws.
Shining like pink argyle diamonds in the sky
That’s a load of crap
This one actually happened last night. I have this 'friend' that I have been in a non-committed relationship with for over two years now. He was just out of a long bad marriage and I have had a long string of bad experiences. We just seemed to mutually came to the understanding that we'd carry on how we had been and do what we do and not have any strings. It's been going along just fine. Sometimes one of us gets a little more attached, or the other pulls away but, generally it's been lovely. We've always got a 'date' but, don't have to worry about making plans around what the other one is doing.
Of course no nursery can be complete without a comfortable spot for feedings. In keeping with our shabby-chic vibe, I'd scour Craig's List for a glider and save on upholstery costs by just having a nice matelasse or twill slip covered created. A delicate side table in a pretty petal pink and an ottoman upholstered in Amy Butler's Happy Dots would round out this little corner.
PS. What does this pic have to do with sewing? Nothing. Totally random. I don't have any sewing pictures. That in itself is shocking...
Well, what a lovely morning I have had here at the Rubies' Place. Miss Lottie and I have been busy bees. Lottie has done so much colouring and building things with her new set of Mega Blocks that her Daddy bought her on the weekend, all the while chatting away to me...I really don't think she stops talking for more than a minute...or singing!!
Miracle Fortress (CA)
Close bosom-friend of the maturing sun
11. Whiskey And Gin (Livin’ Blues) 2:03
The streets are filled with zombies. Move through the crowds without giving yourself away. Observe the dead and their places covertly. Make sure you always have an escape route. Survive by moving.
I don't think you'd find an actual psychopathic killer on a chain gang, because that guy would have just gotten hanged outright.
Ok now I need to go and clear the holy mess on my desk and floor, before I kill myself leaping over everything and unbury my armchair...so that I can stream on USTREAM tonight.
There's a bailout coming but it's not for you. It's for all those creeps hiding what they do. There's a bailout coming but it's not for you. Bailout coming but it's not for you.
This is November 07, 2007:
God had dealt with sin before. The grumpy grannies and grandpas, men and women in the desert who had left slavery in Egypt – sulked and moaned. And God dealt with sin – there was judgement through snakes!
3. The Milkshakes - Out of Control
What aspect do you find most intriguing in novels containing Mail-order brides?
The federal guidelines are clear that grants are not supposed to go to new schools that are “merely extensions of each other.”
What do you think could give an Award the value being a tribute for …?
Tomorrow, while I might not have quite as much self control, I'm hoping to finish the choker and maybe get a little more work done on hubby's birthday present. I have about a week to finish. I'd tell all about it, but with my luck, this would be the one time he'd actually read my blog and ruin everything. Don't worry, I'll tell all about it next week when it's finished and given to him. I'll take pictures, too.
- only 5% of the adresses appears to be wrong. This accuracy is provided thanks to the customers who “create” the adresses themselves
Through what somber fields
Paur has a voice that wraps itself around me and turns me into a gooey puddle of liquid bliss. I found several videos, but I will only post two of them. These have only the words; the ones with scenes from the movie aren’t as pure in sound….
over.
As expected, he laughs a little at me, but thankfully is able to set the bracelet free and we are finally on our way.
I have always had a passion for cooking and being in the kitchen, but recently I’ve found that I much rather bake. The way I see it, cooking is more of a science while baking is more of an art., and let’s face if science was never my strong suite. Of course cooking has its artistic qualities (for all you chefs out there) but there is just something about baking that seems freer to me. You never know what you will find when you begin to make something new and what ideas can expand from this. More on that later, I forgot we were talking about me, I’m a 20 year old college student at the University of Colorado. That being said, I don’t always have time to bake a fantastically marvelous cake so I’m always looking for ways to get a quick sweet fix without paying ridiculously priced good… Let’s see what adventure we get out of this!
We are so honored to be guest posting this month on Classic Bride. Sarah has such impeccable taste and we've been reading Classic Bride since before we even starting blogging ourselves! Our Thursday posts on CB will be based on four different flowers that we've used as inspiration for weddings in each season.
Preheat oven to 350 degrees. Butter and flour 2 (8 inch) round cake pans and set aside.
"Oh, good, Mommy. How much do you have?"
JAY KINNEY is the co-author, with Richard Smoley, of Hidden Wisdom: A Guide to the Western Inner Traditions (Quest Books, Spring 2006) and editor of the anthology, The Inner West(Tarcher/Penguin, 2004). He was publisher and editor in chief ofGnosis magazine from 1985-1999 (www.gnosismagazine.com). His latest book is The Masonic Enigma. You can visit Jay at www.jaykinney.com.
"I locked myself in my home and I just started writing. I didn't know what I want to do; it was more like 'let's just write and see where this goes and make this like a natural progression.' What you hear is where it went. The more we started listening to it the more my producer started going, 'Dude, you know, you can just call this what it is.' I was like, 'What are you talking about?' And he goes, 'Why don't you just call this Tommy Lee?' After thinking about it for a while, I realized he was right. That's when I made that decision, to just go under my own name rather than a 'band' name."
ran after him only to give him a peck on the cheek in return.
As I said, Dea did, well... not much of anything these last two weeks. She got busted spending school time watching videos on YouTube, commenting on songs on Pandora, and visiting various other sites she has no permission to visit. That pretty much explains the lack of actual school work to show at the end of the day.
Now back to the post for today...
Resisting the urge to grab my yellow highlighter, I opted instead to bookmark pages with pieces of paper. There were so many quotable paragraphs. At times, I even posted a few of those quotes from the book onto my Facebook account. The book hit me in both good and bad ways.
Well, that and a bunch of other stuff. I'm just being cynical.
We are essentially like anyone else, and we have our individual challenges to overcome, just like everyone else.
They lit the first candle on the large menorah at Mel Lastman Square today. The public square in the heart of Toronto's northern most suburb is a hub of activity year round but when Chanukah and Christmas approach, there's an extra special warmth in the air.
I have honestly, always always believed that the success of a photography business rides on how well a photographer does two things:
they make any outfit perfect.
My bet is that this won’t last long, as Braska is a really really light sleeper, like her mother. I’m thinking that KiKi will end up in her bed or the recliner before too long. But while it lasts, it’s just adorably sweet.
And the true figure could be twice as high as less than half of police forces responded.
i got 2 blacks, 1 each of dark purple, orange, red, pink, dark green, fluorescent blue, dark blue, and teal, and during winter i layer pakai 2 baju making it boomz..
Last year, Trish signed up with Collca to write for their new ebook series, illustrated BiteSize Travel, which allows her to indulge her passion for photography. Masks of the Moryons: Easter Week in Mogpog, was released in December 2011; Journey in Bhutan: Himalayan Trek in the Kingdom of the Thunder Dragon, was released on 20 April 2012.
So what’s the quickest route to unlocked bliss? Make sure all your ducks are lined up before attempting to unlock your iPhone. The result is a much less painful process. Based on my own experience and what we’re hearing, here’s how to legally unlock your iPhone in short order:
I understand the rules and, when given the chance, I can play a mean round of mini golf, but the proper kind?
Game day plans are being developed with the Hawaii Rugby Union and a big crowd is expected to turnout for a full day of rugby and entertainment to support both teams.
Thanks for listening, and if you want to be interviewed for LIFE WORK BALANCES send an email to lifeworkbalances@gmail.com
Thank you. °Ü°
-All pledges must be taken by 3/15
And they tie it way too tight
But I’m still here at the start, and I still haven’t gone any further. Squat monsters, giant turtles, sentient bullets, and some jerk throwing spiky animals from the sky have been my constant companions all these years, and they don’t even remember how many times we’ve done this song and dance. That infernal music is like a drill into my eardrum. It never ends. It never, ever ends and even the sweet embrace of death has become something bitter that I must swallow every time it comes.
And a haberdasher's shop could be a quite substantial store.
So, exactly what is it, that Obama wants us to get over? Does he want us to get over the fact that the the more capable candidate, that had more experience, did not win the nomination? In my opinion, she did, in fact, win and the DNC handed you the nomination; despite the fact that you do not have the experience necessary to become the President of the United States.
I was recently pointed to the book, Out of the Blue, by Jan Wong. I read a review of it by Heather Mallick on thestar.ca and in it she mentions that depressed people are hard to spot, that they are the same as you and me, standing on the subway just trying to get through another day. No matter the stress levels I experience commuting, there is no way that could compare to the horrid experience of commuting while clinically depressed. It’s an old coping mechanism, but thinking that many people have it much worse really puts things in perspective.
I knew I only had one choice: start gathering donations to send back home. So that’s what I did. Without a clue in the world how I would get them there, I began collecting clothing and supplies. I blasted on FB that ‘my people’ needed help, and arranged a drop-off point at the school my girls attended. My friend Jen Levinson, who is the genius behind Jen’s List, helped get the word out too. Donations began to pour in. In 72 hours, I had more than I knew what to do with.
Also important to note – the herbs in this salad are not simply a garnish. As you can see from the amounts I’ve called for, they are in fact an integral ingredient to the traditional fattoush. Think of the herbs as you would lettuce, and remember that they too boost this salad’s nutrition profile, big time.
Mitch Albom is one of those millions of people who are lost somewhere in the monotony of life. A sports columnist by profession, he has reduced his life to a mere rat-chase. He is vehemently engrossed in his professional life, ignoring his wife and all the other little things that once held an importance in his life; pricking every single bubble that ever dared to glide. He does not have the slightest hint of what he has been missing out on life until one day, he comes across a TV interview of his former professor, Morrie Schwartz. Morrie was suffering from ALS and was counting the last days of his life. Mitch is, at once, reminded of his days at school and the promise he made to Morrie to stay in touch and he sets out to see his old dying Professor. “Coach”, as Mitch calls Morrie, still edifies him every Tuesday about Life’s little but great lessons.
"Jeff, your mind is capable of so much more than you know," she replied with a knowing smile. Then she started to say something else, but I woke up before she could finish.
This didn't instill much confidence in me for our business venture, the one thing it did tell me is our advertising has to go further a field to be successful.
Any time restrictions that might affect your raid availability:
Is my word count too long?
I love, love, love, love her!
247. Handful of Raw Almonds @ Home (Phoenixville, PA) 1:54 p.m.
consequently had absolutely nothing to wear.
For the shields of the earth belong to God;
I'm still getting emails, having conversations, asking questions. I thought I would wait to publish until I was done, but like all things on this tango journey - this will never be "done."
It wasn't long enough for me to explain to my desperately sick father, that I finally "Got It"..........
2 cups oats
The only eye of the day.
Kerri: You said that about this shirt the last time I wore it. Which was last summer. Because after what you said about it last time, I didn't want to wear it again!
Will: Government harms freedom and equality
When dining in the home of others, I find it essential to abide by three rules. Always arrive on time, always compliment the cook and never anally prolapse all over the hall.
Fyrinnae Bastet
The very name Tissot stands for quality and style. Over the decades this Swiss watchmaker brand has built for itself a formidable reputation as the manufacturer of some of the world’s best watches.
Another Private Intelligence Contractor or PIC is Science Applications International Corporation (SAIC), an $8 billion corporation involved in defense, intelligence community, and homeland security contracting. In the words of veteran journalists Donald Barlett and James Steele,
Bad memories aside, I love how a horse print can funk up an outfit. The elegant print oozes sophistication, even if in real life, they smell…
Using a stand mixer or handheld mixer, cream the butter until light and fluffy. Add the powdered sugar and cream some more, scraping the sides of the bowl a time or two. Stir in the vanilla extract, cocoa powder, egg white, and salt and mix until the cocoa powder is integrated and the batter is smooth and creamy and the consistency of a thick frosting. Add the flour and mix just until the batter is no longer dusty looking. It might still be a bit crumbly, and that's okay.
As long as I'll be on the phone with the school, I'm tempted to let them know just how I felt about the registration evening. But I don't know if I want to establish myself as one of the *those* moms already.
I've made both of these card previously. I had some lovely positive comments from people about these cards.﻿
For the first time in the history of mankind we are faced with an imminent global crisis – global warming – and a decade or so to make necessary industrial changes to begin to slow down CO2 emissions. We have the scientific information, the media bombards us almost daily with record-breaking statistics and now collectively we will make a decision: business as usual or allowing human ingenuity, capital markets with some government reallocation of subsidies to steer us on safer path that our children depend upon.
They walked along in silence for a while. They came to an iron grating set in the stonework. Some sort of overflow, perhaps? The grating covered a deep shaft. It was thrilling to look down it.
Wilfried Marxer, a political scientist and director of the Liechtenstein Institute, said other small states such as San Marino manage to survive without monarchies.
The bunch that fetched the top price had about 35 grapes, each slightly smaller than a ping-pong ball, Isu said. The average price for the Ruby Roman grapes at Monday's auction was about $245 a bunch.
I'd love to write here all of the reasons I hate you so, so much, but the length of that list is, quite frankly, daunting. I'd have to neglect my children's dinner, and their bedtime, and quite possibly getting them to school in the morning. (And, there is already a super awesome one here, as it turns out.) But, here's...oh, 15 reasons, off the top of my head:
Gift Tradition
You also have to determine what version of Asterisk you are running. You need to be running at least Asterisk 1.8.1.1, or something in the Asterisk 1.8.2 branch or higher, for outgoing calls to work. From the Asterisk CLI you can enter core show version to see what version of Asterisk you are using. If you don’t have the correct version you will need to upgrade Asterisk. If you’re running an earlier version of Asterisk, see Links and Information: Updating an Asterisk/FreePBX system so you can use Google Voice for possible assistance.
Chaotic describes it pretty well, messy is another word that comes to mind. I think creative chaos is the norm for most artists. When it gets to the point it hinders the process you just spend part of a day cleaning and re-organizing a bit and then off you go again!
So good that this morning, my mirror choose to fall from my wall and broke into a million of pieces ! Wonderful !!!!
I said my best part of the day was that I got a copy of Wally Lamb's The Hour I First Believed in the mail today to review on Betty's Lit Lounge, and I'm so psyched. It's huge though--over 700 pages.
1/2 cup raisins
.... I've spilled my tea again. I'd better go before it gets onto my computer *sigh* *Taylamatay problems* :P
Translatation: Rogier Creemers
Marketers have woken up to the impact of social media fairly early. But then social media is not just about consumption. These are the net personas of mostly real people, who live in the real world.
Clean litter box
in a pan add oil and heat till smoking ,add the mustard and the peanuts after the seeds crackle.saute taking care not to burn the peanuts ,add the curry leave sand the onion and saute till transparent..(that means you can fry the onions till the stage that the skinny chef says that his onions are nice and brown)add the tomatoes and season with salt and dhania and haldi and red chili pdr.dunk the poha in the Pan and saute one minute .cover and then pack in a tiffin box with chutney.
With each passing year, the difference between America's prisons and America's public schools becomes smaller and smaller.
Ajwain gives a smoky flavor to this paratha.Cauliflower(Gobi) mingles with coriander leaves gives a nice flavor to this.Spice it up with green chilli and you dont need any sidedish.
“Fortunately she listens to the advice of the young man who helped send her here. And he has advised her not to attempt any more magic for now.”
And the girl I want just walked away.
for myself,
Every region of Delhi from Central fast paced Connaught place to the sloping tin roofs of laid back Kashmere gate , the posh South Delhi and the ruins of Mehruli to the Step-child East Delhi all the areas have a very distinctive way of life.
This moisturizer, while called a gel-cream is much more a gel than a cream. Out of the few gel- creams I've used, this seems to be all gel. The moisturizer light to the touch and has a light fresh scent. The scent isn't harsh, but could be bothersome to some. The moisturizer feels almost like water on the skin and absorbs quite quickly. I can feel the difference it makes on my skin immediately after I apply it. It leaves my skin feeling soft and moisturized but still clean and fresh. Some heavier moisturizers leave me with an almost dirty feel because they are heavy on the skin, but this moisturizer is actually refreshing and light.
There is a shortage everywhere. Our programs can only do so much with the funding that we have; residents will likely fall through the cracks and not receive the services needed to continue their growth. Our government looks to put a band aid on all of our social problems…a quick fix, at best, while long-term problems fester. But in the long run, our plants may never flourish and produce the way they should. We can all work together to produce the best garden we can, because our future really does depend on it.
The key question for BFS members to consider is this: would things have been better had these rules been in place for this year’s awards?
And a present from big sister Tess -two water guns, one for her and one for him.
Item! - Via Artforum.com via The New York Times, we learn that Bob Fitzpatrick, Director of the Museum of Contemporary Art, Chicago will be retiring in 2008. The search is ON! Do YOU have what it takes to run an internationally renowned contemporary art center?
What this incident showed me is that I have the gift of understanding moral nuance, and ought to share my gift with others. What is the proper way for one to act when placed in a situation where you have to combine the desire to assist a fellow human with knowing how to react when you inevitably fail? What do you say to your neighbor when you meant to wave “hi” but instead almost run him over? Should you hold the door open for a coworker who has to jog across the parking lot to keep you from waiting for them? If you’re an executioner in Iran, do you apologize to your prisoner for the inconvenience of beheading him?
Shine about without fright
Fatigue
Just today, I was sitting in my class on the romantic revolution in literature, and we were discussing dreams, nightmares, and the subconscious. While giving her opinion, a girl switched between saying “conscious” and “conscience,” as though they are the same thing. They are different words with different meanings.
Boil Size: 13.01 gal
I now have all this stuff in digital form, having bought an ex-girlfriend the Complete Hi Recordings CD set and copied it, but if you see the Straight From The Heart LP going cheap, please pick it up for me.
The Homewood/Folly Quarter/Triadelphia route is our ICC. People believe that these rural roads have little traffic and are good for serene quiet bike rides. Believe me, other than the Sunday morning of the races, these roads are anything but serene.
tree and knew that she was the tree.....
I think they are a cop-out. Now I hesitate to say that because recently one of my favorite authors had a cliff hanger ending and I wanted to scream- but still love the author. One difference was she finished the storyline of the original book before introducing the new danger.
I do not think of myself as a Doctor Who fan, in fact I don't consider myself to be a "fan" of anything really.
Registration is required prior to your first qualifying flight in order to receive Double Miles. Double Miles valid only on qualifying paid nonstop Alaska Airlines flights between Seattle and Fort Lauderdale. Travel is valid from July 16, 2012, through September 11, 2012. Flight miles must be credited to your Alaska Airlines Mileage Plan™ account in order to earn Double Miles. All travel must be completed by September 11, 2012. Not valid on free or award travel. Double Miles do not count towards elite status. Please allow four to six weeks for travel and Bonus Miles to be credited. All terms and conditions of the Mileage Plan™ program apply. Offer subject to change without notice.
“Everything comes and goes just like lovers and styles of clothes…….
*Go camping, hiking, or on a nature walk.
* This flat is made of 70% rayon bamboo and 30% organic cotton fleese.
And onwards towards that great expanse
Stone Sublimely Self Righteous- a Black IPA
I'm totally stealing your child the very instant he's old enough to travel internationally. I'm going to dress him in too-tight pants, a striped shirt, lovingly place a crooked beret on his head and teach him every single swear word I know while blowing smoke directly up his nostrils and telling him that wine is "god's water". You have about 11yrs to prepare for the end of the world. I might also take him to the Eiffel tower, but I'm not sure if that will be cool when he's 11, so it's penciled in for now.
I have a doctor! It’s been a long time coming—about 3 years to be exact. When you turn 18, you lose your family doctor that you had growing up. Now that you are an adult, you have personal responsibilities like seeking a doctor to look at your personal areas without having your parents there in the room.
She sat down where she stood and with head bent forward held Tilly up to cover her eyes. She didn’t want to see anymore. Not the awful letters traced through frosted windows. Not the worse faces behind the awful letters. The eyes were so angry and the mouths twisted in accusation. She may have been only seven but she knew that they hated her and she knew exactly why. Small heart twisted as if a fist the size of her father’s was squeezed tight around it as she wished that she could explain to them that it wasn’t her fault. She didn’t want to come outside and taunt them with the fact that they couldn’t. If it were up to her she would stay trapped behind a window all day just like them. All she wanted was to be like them, to have them not hate her. But all she had was Tilly, outside and the friends she made up in her dreams day and otherwise.
The sun is shining and my spring kaleidoscope beckons. Gotta buzz!
Move it to the right one spot so it is touching (but not overlapping) the circle you just drew. Continue on with the top row until you have drawn circles all the way across. Now make another row directly underneath the row you just made. Start at the left, making sure the top of the circle is touching the bottom of the circle above it.
Sinethemba died after her intestines were pulled out through her vagina,
Classic Albums series is different. Instead of dedicating the
Following in the foot steps of last years sensation, Black Joe Lewis, these guys will get your money maker moving.
At least the pants are up, right?
We didn’t actually reach Southend at the first go because Tigger decided we should disembark at Benfleet. I had no idea why we were doing so or whether we were going to spend some time here so I quickly took this photo of the station to remind me where we were. (When following Tigger, it’s sometimes hard to remember where you’ve been!) As it happens, that was the only photo of Benfleet I managed to take as we straightaway boarded a bus to somewhere else.
When I first began teaching art I was so excited to have the job, I started teaching "everything" I knew about the subject in the first session! I talked endlessly, never passing to take a breath, switched from one aspect of my subject matter to the next, gave multiple examples to accent my points, and sincerely wondered why I was getting blank stares.
John over at The Pursuit of 80's(ness) was kind enough to send me a stack of cool Giants cards, many of which I need for my team sets that I'm trying to work on.
I miss you when I don’t feel comfortable in my own skin, and then I remember how I felt with him. He knew me, through and through. I thought he loved me, no matter what, no matter the insecurities or flaws that were pervasive within me. I miss you when I can’t seem to be myself around someone new, because I’m not sure I know myself anymore.
is an old art.” She studied his eyes, trying to determine how much to tell him.
WORK ON THE PLAN
Quite honestly, life is so much easier when he leaves us alone.
I hope you all enjoyed this little peek into my world.
With no guests to consider, we pondered the globe. Courtyard riads in Morocco, white beaches in Mexico, 15th century castles in Ireland. I envisioned a classic venue with a dream-like quality. But the costs were staggering, and the details never panned out. We didn’t want it to feel forced or like work. We wanted it to feel like a natural extension of ourselves and our life. Or, like I tell my brides, “just one beautiful day in a lifetime of many.” We’d heard about San Francisco’s City Hall; when we saw these photos by Lilia Photography, we were hooked. (Less than two weeks later, we booked her for our own date in August, in a city we both enjoy but have never visited together.)
Clutter: This is a good example of it. Unfortunately, the cupboard still looks the same, but I am aiming to be able to proudly show a new photo of it in the next post. That's my personal challenge. Here's hoping!
But, there is an easier way to make the move from word processing to XML in a content management system (CMS). Take steps to change the way your staff works and thinks before actually making the transition and get them used to working in a structured environment by doing these things:
When you walk where Christ walked; when you are no longer just resigned to the Cross, but your whole soul takes on its form—takes on its very shape; when you love the Will of God; when you actually love the Cross… then, only then, is it He who carries it.
Hollie kicked it off with “River Deep, Mountain High”. This girl is in it to win it. She looked relaxed, it was good energy, and I hope she makes it to the final!
Meshes of the Afternoon – 6
Here’s the last song demo for the album AN ETCHING IN TIME – it’s called Vintage Minds and it’s actually number 9 on the album. I hope you like it – it makes me feel nostalgic or sentimental in a happy sort of way . . .
She remembered the morning, two weeks before, when she had walked into the oncologist’s office. The children and Daniel had been outside, waiting; a solid bulwark of love. But she’d wanted to hear this news on her own.
My first day on the job and I am so excited. After being unemployed for most of this year, a small software company in Boston has hired me. It only took three weeks to relocate to a house south of the city in the community of Pekingnocginot Heights.
We've had a few meetings and exchanged pictures and the cakes I like best are the traditional round three tier ones. The tiers are to be quite deep and stacked upon each other to keep it modern. Its going to be quite plain possibly with some black and white ribbon wrapped around the tiers and maybe with some flowers. It may also have some little spots like the third picture. We are just finalising the details however these pictures will be similar. What do you think?
I solved this problem two ways. I have a couple of black purses, but my most favourite and the one I carry most of the winter months, is one I bought from Avon called the Butler Bag. It comes with all the organizer pockets built right in to the interior of the purse and has lots of room for keys, wallet, makeup bag, daytimer, vitamins, and lots of other stuff I carry around with me every day. I don't switch out my purse too often when I'm carrying this bag, because it just works so well for me. I have seen lots of purses in different stores with organizers built into them, I think they are pretty popular right now!
Good morning all. I am sure you have all been wondering just exactly why I have been so silent. Certainly it is very uncharacteristic, to say the least. But the truth of the matter is, there has been a rather large monkey wrench (darn those monkeys anyway) thrown into the cogs on the wheel of life around here. So bear with me while I figure out how to go about this.
OK, well it's not really cold outside here. We've had a bit of a heatwave this week. But it will be cold. In fact, I believe they're calling for snow this weekend. Without a doubt, you need a good winter coat when you live in Chicago. I have a problem finding the perfect winter coat, however. If I find a nice, toasty jacket that keeps me warm while I'm shoveling outside, or when picking my kids up from school, or while running errands, it will undoubtedly make me melt when I get inside the school, or church, or store. And who wants to carry a big, bulky coat around with them especially when they're already juggling kids and packages?
32 was a big year for me. Nothing truly notable happened, but I think I learned more this last year than any year of my life.
“Come on in Greenie and I’ll get that kettle on!”
Merciless, the magistrate turns ’round
In effect, termination isn't really termination--it's an indefinite extension of your original grant of rights, rendering the official 3-year contract term moot. And--talk about a Catch-22--because the contract has officially terminated, you're no longer covered by its guarantees and protections. Is this even legally enforceable? Perhaps a lawyer or two will weigh in.
To see the fertile sun forsworn...
My phone calls are being monitored
But then one day when I got home from work I remember seeing a NYC morgue truck in front of Freddie’s house. I figured it was Freddie’s mom that died because she was quite old. As the black body bag was being carried out of the house, Bobby’s wife Eileen was holding on to it and crying. It was Bobby Wilson.
... wait for it folks ...
In the SASS, children learn early on that their performance will be subjectively assessed each day, and that if there performance is deemed substandard they will be subject to remedial measures with the goal of improving up to a minimum standard.
a. The government unit needs to have at least five people, and
O’Brien had been feted as something of a hero after he confronted Pat Kenny about his salary live on air during Monday night’s edition of The Frontline. I was watching the show myself and, as soon as he started his rant, I knew I would probably have to go after him the next day.
And most of them
P and I bonded after the others turned on me. I was friendless, and P was there, needing an ally just as much as me. Eventually, by the following year, everyone had accepted P and let me back in. They thought they were doing me a favor. L and S, I could tell, felt bad about it all, and didn’t know how to 100% return to the bond we had before. There’s no going back.
There are occasions when you don't have a lot of time to make a card,( more and more often in my case at the moment) and need to be able to put something together quickly and this design would fit the bill perfectly.
When you call Pizza Hut and ask for delivery, they laugh.
But I know a lot of you are dealing with the same situation asme, which is this: you love to dress in a vintage or rockabilly style, but your city or town is basically desolate of anyone that is even somewhat close to being similar to you. What is a girl to do?! Well, let me fill you in on my own experience, and you can use that as a guide for your own life and style.
I’m doing my best to remain calm under pressure and be grateful that I have time to enjoy, this one last time, the azaleas and rhododendrons that we’ve planted. The shrubs that we’ve seen from twigs to six foot monsters, the clematis that scrambles over the old oak tree. The bluebells that were a serendipitous extra that came with some topsoil we bought years ago. One last time to enjoy the clean, fresh leaves of a hosta that has travelled with us over four moves.
Sheryl followed Amara and helped the nurses find her clothes. I was thankful we had bought a local “Hospital Newborn Set” of clothing, which is what the nurses dress all babies in when they are born.
I've been feeling disgruntled about my body recently. Just like Luke, it continues to grow and my belly continues to spill out over top of my pants. Unlike Luke, my extra chub is far from cute. Even though Luke is eating more solids (praise God!), I'm still eating like I did when he nursed every three hours and have the tight pants to prove it. I'm hoping to eat healthier in attempts to not only curb the growing pudge, but also feel better and live healthier. (Plus I've got to be a good role model, and chowing down on fudge-covered animal crackers at 9am is not the best example!)
If you are new I wanted to write directly to you this morning. You see - it was only 4 months that I was new too. And I remember how much it freaked me out!
And Robin Pagan is talking his fair share of shit with this comment
I couldn't pass it up.
1 celery stick, chopped
For my project, I'm featuring the Fall-O-Ween and Sweet Wishes Bonus Set. For more details or to make this set YOURS, please click on the preview:
As the student had acted in a manner that was detrimental to the reputation and welfare of the university community, his actions breached the NUS Code of Student Conduct. A Board of Discipline was thus convened.
The media are not and have never been outside of the debate, and most certainly not as neutral observers.
That is also the reason behind the quarrel Michelle Chia and Thomas Ong had. Michelle thinks that Thomas had an affair. Even though there was no physical contact between him and the other woman, to her, her husband has already crossed the line.
WARNING: Must love vampires.
Aren't the colors soft and soothing?
“A Week in December” has enough good parts to make it worth reading. It’s by no means a classic but it delivers enough pleasure to set it apart from much of the drivel published today.
Florida isn’t my usual comfort zone, but here I am, sitting on the little patio at my hotel suite, coffee in hand, laptop on lap, watching a lizard (I think it’s an anole) try to sneak up on me. He’s not terribly subtle, being the color of a fresh leaf and flaring the little flap on the underside of his neck. The Florida air couldn’t be less like Colorado: it’s not even nine am and I’m already steaming. I always feel a bit greasy here, despite the best efforts of the ubiquitous air conditioning. I can’t believe I need to iron anything. I would think the air itself would flatten the crease in my work shirts.
Stop Kony - yes, arrest Kony - if we can but its more likely he'll go down fighting in a bloody slaughter. Even Bob Geldof once said that the only solution to Kony was probably to have him killed.
Most companies who employ people to drive on the job obtain a “driver abstract” or “Motor Vehicle Report” (MVR) to verify that the employee is properly and currently licensed to operate a motor vehicle.
The Symposium is organized by the INTA Professor Task Force:
After thoroughly analyzing the undemocratic, yes, but relatively benign Afrikaner rule in South Africa, and the disproportionate international reaction to it, only one of two conclusions can be drawn. EITHER
皆無 かいむ, kaimu = nothing
However the novel may be used to promote whatever -isms, it is at its core, a cynical and terrifying insight into the mind of George Orwell’s greatest paranoias and experiences.
Punchestown on September 29, 2002. His only other success that season was on the Roche-trained Allofasudden, who took a handicap hurdle at the 2003
I liked the Jeremy Brett interpretation on the TV (much later I learned that my father-in-law-to-be had been script editor for that series). I liked Robert Stephens in the film The Private Life of Sherlock Holmes. I enjoyed the late Michael Williams on the radio (even though a dog was addressed as "Cerebos" - so you had to take it with a pinch of salt). I am too young for Basil Rathbone
Save $1.00 on Febreze Noticeables Refill
4. Dying
Accessories: Dimensionals, ribbon from May Arts, liquid pearls, spellbinders nesties, scallop circle punch from SU! and copics
Only Child Writes
Of course a fire and marshmallows were compulsory. Ds1 had seen on Ray Mears that in survival cases where it was difficult to light a fire because of damp kindling it was possible to use plastic. So he took apart a blue connector rod pokey stick thing that for some wierd reason ds2 had brought along and set fire to it. Result.
Conducting such audits, for want of a better word, is brave enough. Publishing the results will be quite another.
“You nosey ape! What do you want to know that for?”
PEOPLE
I had the most interesting weekend at my Army weekend that I've ever had!
I’d been told that I should try my hand at a place called Northrend now, so I worked on my skills until I was able to fish and cook my catch from those areas. I don’t know a lot of recipes for the ingredients there yet, but there’s a cook, at an inn in Dalaran, who has graciously allowed me to buy recipes in exchange for a little work. The work is easy enough – it’s just a nuisance going there every day (because the area I’m working in is on one side of the continent and Dal is in the middle. I get a taxi flight but it costs more gold than I’d prefer to spend).
This week it is TEAM A's turn to provide the inspiration and you might notice the odd member of Team B sneaking in as well.
i was not been interested in purchasing cartridges, as expensive as they were, for only a couple of images that i would be able to use. so, when they released the Cameo, with the online store allowing you to purchase one image at a time, i was sold and hubby purchased it.
I swear, friends should NOT let friends drink and date. If they do, friends should MAKE SURE friends don't have sex while drinking with their date. Seriously. Have you ever had one of those days where you wonder what the HELL you were thinking? I've been having LOTS of those lately!
Gert here. This is pure HO/JW…I’m copy-catting here….You’re boring. Repetitive
Stamps: Sassy Studio Designs - Wednesday Sara Addams Digital Image
Stash? Yeah...remember THIS crap?
"With over 1000 expressions defined clearly and entertainingly, this book should be the first reference point to understanding intellectual property terminology. It will be particularly helpful to practitioners when they encounter expressions they have not seen before which they need to understand the true meaning and definition of. Students finding unfamiliar terminology and concepts will also appreciate the instant explanation available from this essential resource".
Now, because of some of the temper tantrums and tears, I am officially instituting baby boot camp this week at my house. Time out is going to be my two-year-old’s best friend, and hitting, screaming for no reason, and pulling hair are officially banned and will be punished swiftly and decisively. Once that is conquered? Potty training boot camp!
"I have to keep this fire alight," Tom bellowed.
That "existing sarcophagus" is actually a giant shell of concrete that "was hastily built over the wreckage" back in 1986. It has already begun "leaking radioactivity" and needs to be replaced.
First, I want to mention my scale. I have not lost it forever, I have not thrown it out the window, and the number is not going back up in the wrong direction. That being said, you won’t see any scale posts here for a couple more weeks. When I started losing more and more noticeable amounts of weight, I fell into the trap I always do: slave to the scale. I refuse, absolutely REFUSE, to let that happen to me on this journey. This is about so much more than the number on the scale, that I know when I start hopping on it every single day, sometimes more than once…it’s time to lock it up for a few weeks.
Revenge and Resurrection in a Frozen Wasteland!
Equipment identity register (EIR):
And the leader of mankind’s progress
Thusly, I give you Poop Senders. http://www.poopsenders.com/ where you can send cow, elephant and gorilla poop to anyone for literally any reason, anonymously.
This orange one caught my eye. Love it, but didn't love the price ~ $129, seriously!
It is so great to be back with you here at The Open Window.
1-1/2 cups white rum
I also pray that Miss J will be arrested and stopped from the years of drug dealing she has gotten away with, in our hometown. I'm sorry, but I feel like I hate her. I've never met her, I don't know what she looks like, but I hate what she represents. Greed & Evil.
Katherine & Mark – 39
To those photographers out there who are snickering and think I am weak, go ahead and scorn. I know I am being the stronger person here by choosing to say no, or choosing my family and friends over my work when it calls for it.
And humor. Here are these powerful, clever and creative stories that address our inner selves in all our ugliness and glory, while still generally letting the reader feel good about it - and she still manages to be funny, even roll on the floor hilarious. Unfortunately, it's not always effective out of context.
Peace and love.
The second style of Isan music is the warbling ballard, that, if I am brutally honest, bores the living shit out of me. Thais love it, or to be more precise, Isan Thais love it. The melodrama, the angst and the truly awful videos that accompany them. Many was a night where a 30 minute taxi ride home felt like hours because this stuff was banging out of the radio. ’88.5fm Louk Thung Thailand’, you bastard. Only beaten by the all day taxi update phone-in radio show. A joyous affair.
England’s attack on the interests of the merchants and the planters via an imposition of taxes helped stir the Revolution. The ability of the merchants and planters to sell the lower caste shopkeepers, artisans, laborers, and small farmers on the notion that King George was trampling on their liberties as well helped bring them on board. Otherwise there was really nothing else to bind these classes together.
What is “crumpl-gami?” Is probably what you are asking. Or possibly “Why did you leave off the “e” in crumple. Do you think you’re cool or something?” Yes. I think I am cool. Now to address the former question, crumpl-gami was a style I “invented” to create a really new style and type of origami. I say “invented” loosely and in quotes because it was inspired completely by the artist Vincent Floderer as well as the origamist Bernie Peyton who taught me to “mold” rather than fold paper. Taking these words literally and combining Floderer’s super crimp folding style, I literally crumpled paper up to fold it and morph it into shape. I use water as a sort of binding because it loosens the fibers within the paper and then hardens them as they dry to keep the shape. That’s how I got the crown so down to the “point.” (HAHA.) I photomanipulated this piece so it would be green and have a red flame, I don’t have paper that’s this exact. haha. But I really like this style I work with because I literally feel like I can fold anything. I guess some of the extra random creases may take away from the fundamental “clean” origami with sharp creases and everything, but I also feel like it gives more texture, life, and variation (literally no two models will be the same.) I hope that this helps people see that there are so many different ways of seeing origami rather than the normal straight geometric figures. Because the first time, I viewed work from people like Vincent Floderer (look him up now! if you haven’t already.) I was really astounded at how different it seemed.
And Dawkins and Adams are perfectly right in saying the garden is beautiful and we don’t have to go inventing and thinking that there are fairies at the bottom of it to make it interesting.
Thanks for your time, Jess.
Overall Rating: ¢¢¢¢¢
We all just loved that school so much,
BTW2 - No song titles are listed here. The j-card says only "various amazigh songs"
We are in full swing at VBS this year and having a great time, so my posts will be pretty short this week.
Bring a large saucepan of lightly salted water to a rapid boil. Add macaroni noodles and cook until tender. Drain in a colander and rinse well with hot water.
Here is a quick birthday card I made with the narrow foam tape. I wanted to hide the border on the lace with a strip of paper, but I didn't want to use a really wide piece of paper. The 1/4" foam tape was perfect for hiding the lace and glue used to hold down the lace.
So how do we relate this back to everyday life?
Take Boy Soup. When a giant gets a nasty cold, he goes to his Giant’s Home Medical Guide and finds the virus can only be remedied with Boy Soup. But the boys (and one smart little girl named Kate) destined for said soup have other ideas. They trick the giant into eating soup made by boys instead of with boys. The nasty stew they concoct is so disgusting the giant spits it out with such force he blows them all the way home. Delighted with the success of their newfound cookery skills, the kids decide to open a restaurant (one that doesn’t serve Boy Soup, of course!).
You dream of flight through indigo skies
river systems in the country -
Sift together the flour, sugar, salt, baking soda and baking powder. I used to think sifting the ingredients together was unnecessary, but it really does make them better. I think it makes them lighter and fluffier. I also used whole wheat pastry flour because I think it makes muffins much more moist, but you could definitely use all purpose if that is what you have. I always keep Bob’s Red Mill Whole wheat pastry flour in the house for any time I am baking. It is amazing and so much healthier than AP flour. The in another bowl combine your mashed bananas, the greek yogurt, vanilla, egg and canola oil. I used the chobani kids banana honey greek yogurt because that is what I had in the fridge. I used one of those small containers which is just shy of 1/2 a cup. Mix the wet ingredients until they are well combined. Then add the dry ingredients to the wet ingredients and mix until well combined. Next fold in 1/2 cup mini chocolate chips. Spoon the mixture into paper lined muffin tins and fill 3/4 full to get nice big muffins. Bake at 350 for 23-25 minutes or until golden brown.
I've been trying to be a good blogger... lurking is becoming a bad habit. So yes, those footprints you see around your blog, the candy wrappers... that's all me. Sorry, I'll pick up my mess next time.
On Flag Day little Spunky took to the air....such pride, joy, and anxiety.... how odd to see an empty nest..... would they come back? Would we ever see the three of them together again??? I missed those guys more than I ever dreamed I would when there was no one there, and then one by one they would pop back in to eat, or be fed, or sometimes just to bask in the sun. All three in the nest was now a crowded event, much less when mom & dad showed up.........with turtles, furry things, fish, or whatever the food of the day might be.
WHOA! That was fast.
Just wondering.. who drew your, Er, lovely drawing of you? My guess is clay but who knows?
I’ve found that a good way to get out from underneath a bad case of writer’s block is to do exactly what I’m doing now: freewriting. Freewriting is essentially just brain diarrhea. It is unfiltered, unedited writing. The hope is that during a freewriting session, you will accidentally write something that you don’t absolutely hate, then build on it.
1. A tripod is mandatory! Seriously, if you don’t have one of these, get one, pronto. Truly stunning fireworks shots require 2-4 second exposures; it’s not humanly possible to hold a camera perfectly still for that length of time. Which leads to …
Aired January 26, 2012 – 20:00 ET
Through all of this, they have been free to be themselves without the pressures to conform and perform that their schooled friends are experiencing. And our freedom from the school schedule has allowed us to be together, take trips, and participate in our homeschooling community in ways that have enriched our lives beyond our wildest imaginings.
Not a smile, not a titter. Instead I was marched to a quieter area and thoroughly interrogated and warned that I would be investigated for a Race Hate Crime.
Today, me and DD have been relaxing, eating great foods, and we just finished watching the amazing movie Frida (2002). Now it’s time to watch The Spirit (and more movies?) and drink more tea.
Now, where am I at weight wise this week?
Ah, yes you are
Licensee’s use of the know-how
The pink hydrangea has risen in popularity all over the world, but especially in Asia. Pink hydrangeas have many different meanings, but generally means, "You are the beat of my heart", as described by the celebrated Asian florist Tan Jun Yong, where he was quoted saying, "The light delicate blush of the petals reminds me of a beating heart, while the size could only match the heart of the sender.
Thank you, thank you, thank you, to everyone who donates blood, who will donate blood, who has donated blood. That it saves lives is not just a tagline or canned words. You really are a hero.
Tim ticked an item off his Must-Be-Done-Before-You-Die list. He ordered an authentic MacDougall Kilt set with a tailor made kilt, a Prince Charles jacket and vest with shiny silver buttons, a bodwin, a belt and a beautiful buckle. He shall look fantastic. A man well dressed is a very fine sight indeed.
63Those smiling eyes, attemp'ring ev'ry day,
I am very grateful for the opportunity to listen to one of my personal heroes, and I will cherish the memory, utilize the knowledge gained and remember her words for the rest of my life.
I’ve always prayed, Nora. But more so out of feeling obligated. I’m not proud of this. But I’m so humbled that God chose to show me how to pray. Of all the billions of people in the world He could spend his time on, He spent a little time on me. But not just me, He spent time on THOUSANDS of people. He brought them closer to Him and to His kingdom. And how did He do that? Simple. He used you, Nora. You were God’s chosen one for this job. And in order to use you, he needed to use someone he knew would and could carry you. That is where he used your mom and the gift of the written word He has graced her with. Through your mom’s words, which she chose to share with the world, the work of God came through so clearly. Because of her unconditional love for you, and her unshakable faith in God, everyone who reads and follows her blog has fallen in love with you. Nora, your story has been shared by so many people that it has reached all areas of the country and no doubt, will filter out to the world. God is brilliant! I get it and it is so clear. The bible is God’s word and His display of His love for us. He desires that we read it, understand his love for us and in turn, love each other. He showed us how that is possible on a human level through you and your mom. He also desires that we pray every day. Well guess what? So many people have prayed for you every day. I have prayed harder and more sincerely than I ever have in my life. I have noticed God touching my life more than ever before. I have made life changing decisions that include impacting the lives of others that most of the world casts aside. I love my children more. I love my husband more. I love my parents, siblings, nieces, nephews, in-laws, cousins, friends and neighbors more. This is all because of your life and your mom saying “YES” to God. Through all of her doubt, fear and tears, she took the road God laid before her. She partnered with God to give you life and shared your life with us. My God how she loves you! You cannot even comprehend that love. And you know what is amazing? God loves you more, precious angel. And people everywhere, who don’t know you and will never meet you, love you and love your family.
He lives, my everliving Head.
Kriffle is about to despair until he accidentally runs into Fargeeta and decides radical action is called for:
So car less--(and zipper less) I headed home. First a pleasant mile's walk to Hillside Avenue, then a 20 minute wait for a bus, and a longish bus ride. The bus ride ended at the subway terminal—and was followed by a short subway ride home.
There are two things to remember:
02 European Superstate
On Monday night, Tirzah got to go to Amirah's house for a sleepover. Holly and Kyle live there, too. Holly took Tirzah shopping. She got a new shirt, a new dress, and new boots. Tirzah has such a fun sense of style. Good thing she has Holly to help her dress. (The picture below is an example of Tirzah dressing herself.)
I have found them now.
Today's essential vegan skill is cooking beans from scratch- that is, transforming them from their dried state on the bottom shelf of the grocery store aisle into a big pot of saucy deliciousness. Why should you bother to learn this?
The Gunners Syndicate consists of six men – Pat Glynn, Pat Gleeson, Robbie Byrne, brothers Donal and Niall Collins plus John Harte. Arsenal-mad Glynn leads the syndicate, having purchased Seabass as a foal after seeing an advert in the Irish Field newspaper and looked after the horse until he was sent to Ted Walsh as a four-year-old on the recommendation of Ted’s son Ruby. Glynn was helped in raising Seabass by Gerry Kyne from Kiltrogue Stud, the father of the apprentice jockey Jamie Kyne, who was killed in a fire in Norton, North Yorkshire, in September, 2009. Glynn, who hails from Dunmore, County Galway, is a builder who used to play Gaelic football for the local Dunmore MacHales and the Connemara Gaels in the USA. His wife Sinead is a singer who has appeared on a talent competition for Country & Western singers on Irish TV station TG4. Pat Gleeson also comes from Dunmore and he is a director of local company Wheely Environmental Refuse Services. Robbie Byrne, the only member of the syndicate who does not support Arsenal, runs a pub in Dunmore which is the venue for the syndicate’s meetings, while John Harte is a butcher. Despite the fact that the majority of the syndicate support Arsenal, Seabass runs in the maroon and white colours of local football team Galway United.
A couple of weeks ago, one of my favorite art bloggers, Geninne, posted this picture of a cute little mantis figure. It's a Mexican artform called an alebrije, a brightly painted creature that could contain features from different animals, or sometimes just a fantastically decorated version of a single animal.
I went for a girly look on my card using a pink card base with a strip of floral patterned paper along one side. I stamped one of the set’s text print butterflies in Paint the Town Pink ink on an I’m a Princess Pink die cut butterfly as my focal image. It’s set on an oval panel that I stamped with the set’s “imagine the possibilities” sentiment in the same pink ink. For a final girly touch, I added a clear crystal flourish extending from behind the butterfly to make a flight trail.
6) Delaware - 1.89
I am linking up for the first time this year to PINK SATURDAY. I have been a part of this amazing group of bloggers for almost 3 years now!! Please be sure to pop by other participants this weekend on our lovely host Beverly's blog.
And at Max's request - we got our menorah, and caught up on the candles (we're not Jewish, but learning about it anyway)! ( I left the pictures out of them picking their nose behind the menorah, but this is the one that had no one picking their nose.)
‘You’re a very weird person.’
John Rix is adamant he’s given us the lead with a close range header, but the referee penalises Kev Willsher for pushing. An accusation he strongly denies. I then pick up a yellow card. The combination of desperation and necessity force me into a sliding tackle. The referee and I have a difference of opinion. He is not convinced by the circular gesture I make with my hands. He describes it as a bad tackle. The free kick deflects onto Jones’ post.
A new challenge started yesterday and we'd love you to play along. We'd like to see your creations on the theme of either Spring or Easter. One of our in-house sketch geniuseseseses, the lovely Abi, has made a fabulous sketch for you to follow if you would like to - personally I find sketches so useful, particularly when the old mojo has gone AWOL! With prizes from Lili of the Valley and Joanna Sheen on offer, what have you got to lose?
"There was that one in Perignat."
At my last conference, The Portland Rose City Romance Writer’s Conference in Vancouver, WA, I received the typical stack of author business cards. I glanced them over with bored, half-lidded eyes. Yeah, yeah, more business cards. That’s not to say I didn’t like the authors–I did!–just not the cards so much.
Kingston’s main shopping centre
Was it an ‘arm of the State’ which imposed a ten-year ban, on an EDL member, from going on EDL demos and even from accessing EDL websites?
*These are general guidelines that I use and I individualize each patient’s care based on other aspects of general health and needs. You must work with your personal physician on your health issues, and if you are going to use this information, please do so in the context of this very valuable doctor-patient relationship.
And he was happy!
I've been collecting sheets of alphabets for about six months now and decided
I have three different pages. One for Guardians, one for Hashbrown, and one for me as an author. And I'm sure some of you (you may remain nameless) have thought why does Frank post the same update on Facebook 4 times? It's obnoxious! Well, it's because I feel like I have to spread the word any way I can. Now, if I had all of my friends, and fans, and what-not on one page, then, wahoo! Problem solved.
“Go ye into all the world, and preach the gospel to every creature.” Every born-again believer has the authority and responsibility to preach the gospel of Jesus Christ in this earth. If you can’t go, you can send someone in your place.
We have had a great Friday so far, and it can only get better ;)
Yet, Christopher Nolan needed to loosen up his collar on "Inception" and find the humor and playfulness that can come from this odd group of under-developed personalities entering other people's dreams, though Tom Hardy's Eames comes closest to having any fun doing his job. The film seems to feel too ashamed to embrace itself as a caper, so it is weighted down with the same crazy dead wife story device that DiCaprio has already tackled in both "Shutter Island" and even the very end of "Revolutionary Road". Is there any insight into this relationship or is it merely supposed to supply the "depth" to make this movie Serious with a capital S? What does it say when the final shot of the movie leaves you with the question whether Cobb is still in a dream state and my reaction to it was that it did not matter one way or the other?
I'm afraid of what the post-surgical pathology will show.
Our asteroid belt is the debris left over from the formation of the Solar System. The cowboy builders responsible didn’t clear up their mess. They simply swept it out beyond Mars, where the powerful gravity of Jupiter kept it all stirred up and prevented it from clumping into new planets.
Finally, it was as simple as meeting the two velcro halves together to create a nice table skirt. I think it looks much cleaner without all the chord chaos.
no sound to think or feet to go
They attack and assault you, threaten you and your family, damage your house and possessions, telephone your boss and make trouble for you, stop you getting work or a promotion or transfer, all in all make life very difficult for you.
1 x Concealer
So now I’m sitting here, waiting for my flight to start boarding. I’m feeling very optimistic about this semester. My first class will be tomorrow, at 10am. It’s my Video Production class. The funny thing is, the school’s campus portal still doesn’t state who our professor will be. I’m hoping it is someone cool.
But by now I know by now that the bad Some Days pass
Don't care for dainty? Then suit up your child in a crime-fighting suit. Soften up what could be a too-tough look with dark, yet still feminine Abby clip bows. A prominent baby bow also flags the other parents to call her Supergirl instead of Superboy.
· $24,300 at the gas station filling up
But instead, we had even more fun with dinner out and bowling with our great friends, Ginny and Andrew. We are so excited to be in their wedding next August!!
Unyielding
All in all, crazy schedule and life...it is all good. I count my blessings.
It took us a while but we made it back in one piece and I'm sure Prince breathed a big sigh to be back in safety. Silly horse. He can be spooky and not very brave alone, but I think he will learn to enjoy our rides, at least on his non-spooky days. He loves to be the trail blazer in groups!
And there we have it. The two most important aspects of being a good GM: flexibility and good communication. Master this, and the rest will fall into place, whether you’re running Dungeons and Dragons, Eclipse Phase or Bunnies and Burrows.
Foreclosed homes are typically sold at steep discounts, lowering the value of surrounding properties. Cities lose property tax dollars from homes that sit empty and lower property values.
It is a sad song to sing
SEE thru your HEARTS/SOULS when choosing “MOVEMENTS” and directionals of your energies. Instead of NO RETURNS think of how much more “movement” there would be in directing your FLOWS/MOVEMENTS to JUST what you are trying to “CHANGE”. By this it means: IF you are trying to save peoples housing from being “Foreclosed” on then DO JUST THAT….. SAVE THEIR HOMES! This can be done by ALL of your gatherings can it not? Say for example there was a news story in your MSN news not long ago of a foreclosure of a 101 year old woman. The police and movers decided, THEY, decided to NOT follow the direct order of the bank, which was to Evict her from the dwelling/property. This IS a “Big Bank” involved here, I will not go into details at this time. However you see by a FREE-WILL choice those whom were involved made, this woman is still living inside her home….They “Stayed Off” the eviction and foreclosure by doing and choosing of such action….that was the Reaction they received. You see Chelas there are FAR better ways of use of your energies. You see THEY directly “Helped” this woman herself with their choice of Reaction/Action they took. It was a DIRECT MOVEMENT! To the DIRECT SOUL and CAUSE they were trying to help.
You can see (including two clothing) purple top picture in the gallery at the bottom of this is the first time I wore them, they did not give me some muffin top, slightly, because they are very tight. Although they still suck and I wear them (white shirt), second, they did not give me any muffin. They are suitable for much better now than their first. I just stretched out a little, the smallest of creases in the docking area waiting to be lower. I always lower than the back of the pocket area, due to the shape of the crease of my buttocks and thighs, but I hope will go a little more.
and Conquerors are there too,
So many options out there...and all totally doable. Go for it!
— If you are defending and still chose to play as a medic, throw some medi-kits around your M-Com stations. Your comrades will need them. If you’re attacking and have armed a charge, or your team mates are about to, throw some medi-kits around. Fierce fighting occurs around them as the defenders try to discharge, so they will be needed.
I forget, but my New York remembers,
But waiting at the station, it's the same old refrain.
But then again, it sure would make Mondays even harder!
Don't get me wrong. NaNo is fun. At least it's fun up until the last week. That's when you do the math and you realize you're going to have to get 10,000 words a day from now until the end of the month to make it to your goal. It makes you feel like a big, smucky loser and you are sad that you will not be getting a winners badge or t-shirt again this year.
#1 – Student Council
Here I am scoring an amazing deal on some fabric:
Struggling this week. Dealing with loved ones in hospitals, sleep deprivation and a huge sense of overwhelm. Art helps, but it's interesting how it turns out...
No work, no priorities, no worries.
Our friend Kristian has now brought the newest member of our group into the world: Karis Nicole!
Contact Person:NELSON ALEN.
Meanwhile US attorney general Eric Holder has rebuffed criticism that intelligence was lost by giving a lawyer and other legal rights to the Nigerian man accused of trying to blow up a US airliner.
As soon as I saw this it reminded me of being a child racing up and down with my brother and sisters.
We both suffer from
Thursday Night: catch a flight to DENVER to see Kevin
At 720 pages the book covers a lot of ground, but even so, due to the vast scope of Oracle SOA Suite, that’s still just the tip of the iceberg. The book starts well with a section on the concepts behind service-oriented architecture in which the author examines each of those keywords in turn and together (services, orientation and architecture). It’s a neat idea for scene setting and it uses some simple examples that are very helpful for those amongst the readership who are still quite new to SOA.
In Nature’s green Cathedral I found a mighty rock’s knee
Mother’s Marine Corps scrapbook.
Never once had the iron will of the beautiful woman failed her. Father Arbaux, accompanied by two sisters of charity, Captain Bouchardon, and Maitre Clunet, her lawyer, entered her cell, where she was still sleeping – a calm, untroubled sleep, it was remarked by the turnkeys and trusties.
I am at the point where I can admit I have a problem, but well beyond the point of helping myself. I have no idea where I fall in the intervention scale, but I’m pretty sure I need one. Especially because of what happened this weekend.
Finally, a movie that actually has a good underground following…”The Last Dragon”. SHO’NUFF!
Another time of choosing happened when my relationship with Jesus became one of teacher and student. I had learned the scripture from 2 Corinthians 5:19 (NRSV):
s&p to taste
Dash nutmeg & cinnamon
All the struggle we thought was in vain
Let's start with some facts on this matter:
From sleep, he shuddered waking. He prayed to God today would be different. Those dreams. His dreams. Always came to life, haunting him with his eyes open.
Sometimes I'll cough so hard so's to bring up a big bit of brown gack from the back of my throat threatening to make me boke my ring up just by the sight of it alone.
Ps 104:26 There go the ships: there is that leviathan, whom thou hast made to play therein.
”It’s Brian; mom.”
#207 & #208 Adrian Beltre / Shawn Green (Dodgers)
I was recently cleaning some stained kitchen utensils with a homemade solution I read about on another blog. The magical homemade cleaning solution is a mixture of hydrogen peroxide and baking soda. You put a half cup or so of baking soda in a bowl and add hydrogen peroxide until it’s a little wetter than a paste. It’s great for reviving stained cookware and pans. So, anyway, as I was standing at the sink, using it on my vegetable peeler, I looked down and mused about whether this would make the grout on my ceramic tile kitchen floor look better. I decided to try it.
Even after a book is printed, I see things I should have taken out. The Sithe ride bareback, but I must have read Bloodstone thirty times before I noticed Seth slipping his foot out of a nonexistent stirrup. Firebrand was almost ready to go to print when I woke up at 3am with the horrible realisation that something had to be added to it, or Book 3 would have a nonsensical ending.
Those of us in the free world, for whom it is safe, we send our light of solidarity to those of you in the world who are seeking freedom, at the risk of your lives. We have such admiration for you. You are the future of the world.
I am out later tonight with some friends I used to work with, back when I was gainfully employed as something professional, and not just a housework-avoiding charity-shopping layabout.
Incidentally, the base of AT&T Park is The Public House, where local Certified Cicerone Eric Cripe has selected 24 beers on draft plus a couple casks. It instantly made the baseball stadium one of the best ballparks to drink craft.
Greg Beeman (Bushwhacked)
Today’s workout doesn’t have a video, but there are photos. It’s a short one: Day 3, but once again uses the sand bag. I totally went to the Asia Mart yesterday and got some 1kg bags of rice, but I didn’t have a lot of cash, can’t pay with a card there, and more Eel was definitely necessary. Eel isn’t cheap, so I only ended up with 4kg of rice for my bag. I’ll get more later in the week when I’m back in town with more cash. But I think for today that 4kg rice + clothes (and no chafing book) will work. 5.2kg = 11.4lbs
Life moves forward. The insurance company is going to arrange for the dismantlement of the ceiling, and pay the contractor directly. I hope we’ll see some action next week. Then David from ChemDry will come back and see what state the timbers are in. He also wants to inspect a layer of “deafening” which (even with the ceiling down) is best seen from above, by taking up the neighbours’ floorboards, I am happy to tell you.
number of stars by the entries, except
Side 2 -
This will be my 4th time running this race... & I'm nervous
Was it sixth grade that we had a mock Presidential election and all but one boy in the class voted for Nixon?
Since the nerve-racking first days after our son’s birth, I’ve had a bit of struggle coming down from the kind of hyper vigilance that having your newborn in ICU for the better part of a week inspires. In my case too, becoming a father isn’t the only major change happening. For nearly 2 decades now, my life has been centred around study and my own development. Now that is over (PhD graduation is in mid-December) that has brought up the natural question: What next? While often I view this question with a sense of curiosity and optimism, it’s also easy to slip into states of mind that are less enjoyable, to put it mildly. A few weeks ago I thought I was becoming sick. I had nothing physically wrong with me but my digestion was very erratic and I started to feel very tight in the chest making it quite difficult to breathe sometimes, especially if I did anything requiring exertion – riding became quite painful. Getting myself checked out by our GP was good to clear any concerns on one level, but it left me with the fact that I had to deal with anxiety. In spite of the almost constant physical discomfort I was feeling I had to turn my attention inward again, and find a way of letting go of some of the energy that was building up.
I'd love opinions and feedback, not that I'll necessarily listen to you, but just so that you feel like you have a say in this. (I'm totally kidding, I'd honestly love to know what you think!)
Ok this blog is collecting dust. To my friends that enjoy reading it my apologies for the lack of posts. I need a personal assistant to keep up on it for me. For my life just being Kam and I, it sure is busy. It's probably a good thing I am not octomom or I wouldn't have time for anything, especially not my lil ol' blog. Enough of the chatter about how little time I have. Let's get on with it!
Here’s the Chicago way...
I am thankful for this blog for affording the opportunity to read the words of others and consider my own gratitude…there, a good start. Now, to where?
Details about your first personal art piece:
Buys an eight by twelve four-bit room
So when I got home, my phone had 2 messages. One from Mark saying, “Where are you? We’re playing footie on the back field.” And the other simply said, “SHARP 15798 … Tap to view msg”
And it is in this context that Solomon asks God for “understanding heart to judge Your people, that I may discern between good and evil” (1 Ki 3:9, NKJV). And in a moment we are back in Genesis 3, where the human race first came to know good and evil in a way comparable to God’s own knowledge (cf Gen 3:22).
“Forty years after its initial publication, a study called The Limits to Growth is looking depressingly prescient. Commissioned by an international think tank called the Club of Rome, the 1972 report found that if civilization continued on its path toward increasing consumption, the global economy would collapse by 2030. Population losses would ensue, and things would generally fall apart.”
Might have 15 dollars.
Normally, these things are just part of my day. But for some reason, everything is irritating.
Prodigy Firestarter UK
Leviticus 20:13 says: If a man also lie with mankind, as he lieth with a woman, both of them have committed an abomination: they shall surely be put to death; their blood shall be upon them.
So as with last month you can do pretty much what you fancy so long as we can see a flower on to somewhere - even if it's not the stamp itself, there are so many pretty floral punches and ready made flowers available and we all love flowers. The only other requirement is of course that you must use a Black stamp or Stickeroo as the main element.
* Title must be short and compelling. Once the author is well know, the font size for the author’s name will grow, and the title becomes smaller. The type must be clear on both a postage stamp size, and a playing card size. The type selection must be evocative of the genre.
$ 12.00 each + Travel Fare
What has brought this post on?
I hesitate to post this. I don't want to appear judgemental or create a forum for hateful comments that so often follow such an emotionally charged topic. But it's been on my mind. A lot. The topic of home births is everywhere I look. Because I work so closely with the bad luck/bad choice moments, I felt compelled to say my piece.
Elijah: "Oh. Okay."
VALENTINE
* Little miss thing will be an amazing big sister, today she shared the best idea ever..
So in one way or another, I do feel connected with this photographer.
None of my siblings could see it through. They all had emotional meltdowns and couldn’t go back in. One of my brothers had to leave the hospital before it even got to that point. And that’s OK. We all handle these things in our own fashion.
Another two I-beams were utilised again for the main supports with another L-girder wall constructed on top.
On our first Mom-To-Mom Monday, I'm going to share my insight on the book "The Stay-At-Home Survival Guide" by Melissa Stanton. I read about this book in an articles somewhere and when I saw that it was available at the library, I just had to snatch it up.
Tackling the Mail - Simple Tips & Getting Stylishly Organized
"Not yet," she said.
And if you dont know what the heck im talking about, this is how the books look like...
Our host-family in Sontule has a small home in the nearby city of Estellí because the young parents and their 9 year old son all attend school there. They graciously invited Rachel and I to stay with them there for a night on our way back to Managua and we had an incredible time exploring the city, cooking, and visiting family members who we had met during our previous visit to Sontule. We are currently plotting a way to get back to see our friends one last time before we leave the country in two weeks. Whether we can make this happen or not, it is amazing to know that we have made friends here who would open their homes to us in a heartbeat whenever we are able to make our way back to Nicaragua.
Second, in Biblical times a man might address a female as “woman,” but nowhere else in the ancient Greco-Roman world or in ancient Israel do we have a known example of a son addressing his mother with this title. Jesus addressing His own mother as “woman” would be unique in all of antiquity. This suggests that Jesus has some particular purpose in calling His mother “woman” – a purpose that goes beyond the normal, congenial way He addresses other women. When applied to Mary, this title likely has some important, symbolic purpose (which will be considered below).
Pace: 8 ; Parry: 6 ; Toughness: 5 (1)
Original Air Date: Mar 20, 2012
So, let's see what's inside her bag.
Into the heart of the studios you go (through the door to Hogwarts no less, providing there’s a child volunteer on hand to help open it) and you’ll find yourself immersed in the world of J.K. Rowling’s creations, walking on some of the actual sets from the films and surrounded by familiar props, costumes, and anything else you could possibly think of. From the Great Hall to Diagon Alley (the latter of which truly being a spectacle when you first step foot on it), more or less everything is covered in some shape or form, with specially made videos and information to be found alongside to give you the behind-the-scenes scoop. The final part of the tour is easily a highlight so I shan’t spoil it… although according to one of the attendants, it’s made people literally cry with joy upon laying eyes on it. Make of that what you will.
Seriously, I am having a LOVE affair with this "new" find!
I used the Jubilee Cricut cartridge to make the holly leaves because I don't have Tim's die for that.
Taking this mobile journalism class has given me a new view on blogging. I’ve learned about new apps like Meporter, Banjo and geoloqi. Apps that matter in today’s mobile journalism and are very important for a mobile journalist.
I found a great resource on youtube ~ a guy in Canada who knows a lot about light spectra and what works best for growing plants. His website explains the benefits of hydroponic gardening very well, saying it actually uses “95% less water than you would if you grew the same vegetables outside” and the lights he uses “last for 10-12 years running them for 16 hours a day.” For anyone interested, I recommend checking him out!
I walk in to class, and glance up at the clock to see that I am 30 minutes late once again. I ever so gracefully trip over someone’s chair and just barely catch myself before face planting. By now everyone is glaring at me for interrupting their productive test-taking day. I try to ignore them as I feel a blush creeping it’s way onto my already pink face.
The nurse was nice, but rarely said anything to me. She was more concerned with the monitors. She told me that my labor had slowed down. I told her I had been laboring for 15+ hours at home before coming in and that it was probably the move from home to hospital that it slowed down. She didn't care.
sharing your dreams,
If you think Hollywood had one over the quick Filipino filmmakers of the ‘70s, think again.
05. U-Tek – Das Mass der Dinge (5:14)
Kelly Ann Booms, 24, Brookline, Mass.
memories are everything, the good, the bad, and the in-between,
3 employ
She turns back towards the FBI Agents/Celebrity Chefs. "I send out lots of emails," she replies, her tone measured and even, but her eyes fierce and determined. "I don't remember everyone I send them to..."
earthquake more than thunder
I'll start with my throw pillows and am finally, FINALLY, done with shopping for throw pillows. I bought them from etsy seller labdesigns. She did some fantastic work on these pillows - even the color of the zippers are coordinated. How awesome is that?
sounds like we spoiled ourselves, right?
Adrenaline courses through my veins making it painful to stand still behind the massive arena gates. My arms and legs tingle with anticipation. I have been waiting for this moment for as long as I can remember.
i shouldn't be grateful for this weather. i should be sad and scared of our changing climate. i should be mid-tirade on our crazily indulgent and dirty lifestyles that are changing the world like this. i should be telling you stories of trees and plants that are being tricked into budding with the mild temps. how they will inevitably be set back by another frost. how this effects certain farming practices like falling dominoes.
the lady is entering Gawain’s bedchamber. Tiny bright stones,
Then comes the plating... this is the fun part!
By the time he arrived, the complainant had caught and handcuffed the two suspects.
You like?
Taken: 09/23/2011
its not bad to keep asking and keep seeking and keep knocking. because in that process we draw closer to God and we see things from His perspective and we align our hearts with His plans and purposes. and sometimes i wonder if that is the point… that in the asking, seeking and knocking we find God, not just the answers to our prayers, that its all about the GIVER, not the getting.
Was there a golden age for artists and writers? Much like Owen Wilson’s character in Midnight in Paris, I have a highly romanticized idea of 1920′s Paris as a glamorous paradise full of writers and painters and musicians and dancers, gathering in cafes and parlors and clubs, drinking and dancing and creating from dusk til dawn. I feel like if I could somehow slip back in time and space to that era, I could tap into that same bottomless creative well they all seemed to have access to, and create literary masterpieces.
the tops of our crop’s heads
I'm interested in your thoughts about the Economist article and your experiences in graduate school. Is graduate school a Ponzi Scheme?
"nape crochet" - OK, so this is more of the "whatever were they thinking?" kind. And whatever was Google/whatever-else-searching-engine-they-used - whatever was that "thinking" that my blog was hit 7 times with this search?
More interestingly in this audio interview, she further shared her comments on such issues as karma, re-incarnation, ego, unconditional love, besides other spiritual and Near-Death-Experiences(NDE) she encountered following her full recovery from lymphoma.
makes 2 servings
For this race Red Bull use a simpler three element wing, with the trailing edge of the flap cut back to create a shorter chord for less downforce.
Forget about Once Upon a Time . . .
Birch Beam
I'm so grateful to all who've contributed to make it a really gorgeous looking edition but I'm especially thankful to Dorothee Lang and Michelle Elvy who have been the most helpful people anyone could ever wish to work with. For their generosity with their time and advice I am sincerely appreciative. Thank you, ladies.
The only thing that lets this piece down is that I feel that it's over too quick. With such a lengthy build-up and dramatic indirect action, I feel that the come-down could have been a bit more drawn out. Can't say much without spoiling the ending but I would happily have read about another 1000 words of "Tiny Graves".
Book Club Notes from March 6th.
First came out the okra then these small sardine size deep fried fish. Next the STING RAY fin. This was my favorite! A sweet spicy sauce of garlic, chilies, maybe tamarind not sure but it was wonderful. The meat was mild and melt in your mouth flakey.
Long before that, however, the Spaniards, both in their homeland and in their world-wide colonies, excelled all other nations and countries in their love and veneration of Nuestra Senora de la Purisima Concepcion. The flagship of Christopher Columbus on his epoch-making voyage across the Atlantic in 1492 was named not merely Santa Maria, but according to some historians Santa Maria de Concepcion. To the second island he found in the New World, Columbus gave the name of La Concepcion after he had named the first San Salvador. From that time on, countless rivers, lakes, towns, missions in Hispanic America were named for and placed under the tutelage of La Purisima Concepcion.
will be so few that a child can write them down.
1 1/4 cups whole milk or buttermilk
Hariharan
following themes:
Oh wait...one last item...please check back with us on Monday for a special announcement! We are so excited about so many new and fabulous things coming to the Shoe...we'll share just a little bit of that with you on Monday!
Acknowledging that both management and myself fully believe Flower is the Guy (despite the lousy series), a good first step would be to get him a back-up who can play 20-25 games and ease his regular season workload. It’s worth noting that Flower was flagging down the stretch just before the post-season; he would never admit it, but I suspect fatigue and overuse played a role in his poor showing against the Flyers.
There are so many more Dramas waiting on my TVs HD to be watched. ! This season actually might be quite cool.
What was extremely difficult for me at the time of her stroke, was being a medical student at the time and knowing exactly what having an MCA stroke meant. I knew she would be left without an ability to speak. I knew it would be a long road to recovery. My grandmother is the most independent woman I have ever known. We have very similar personalities in some respects. We are both extremely introverted and independent. We both have a big appreciation for nature. We are both freaks of nature in that we LOVE the morning and will get up before 5 even if we don’t need to.
WOW...I can't believe it May! Last week/month has been a blur...I guess that happens when you have three active little munchkins :) !!! Believe it or not, our kids have only 24 more days till *Summer Break*. Not sure if I should freak out or if I should be looking forward to some down time from all the sports activities...etc?!? Anyway, let's hope it will slow down :) .
Hell yeah!
Astonishing.
But back to muffins…this one is good. It has a couple of extra steps involved but they’re worth it because they involve pecans. And pecans are ALWAYS a good thing?!!!
He is offering 4 digis of the winner's choice.
By your mighty pow’r make whole
All over York County, people bought and bought and bought tickets.
wood smoke, coal smoke, the ever-present cigarette smoke
(12) Find the node voltages by node voltage analysis method. (12 marks)
Here's something I whipped up recently with a Saturated Canary image, she's called Priscilla Pie, isn't she sweet!
Superb!
And now that I've seen Mission Impossible, I know why.
if I break my tongue
